1676 | sit (verb): to be seated | loc: sitzen
  EN TS: Sitting with a coffee? Vibes.
  de TS: Mit 'nem Kaffee im Sessel sitzen? Vibes.
  EN FS: Sitting with a book? Vibes.
  de FS: Mit 'nem Buch im Sessel sitzen? Vibes.
  EN TP: sitting in an armchair
  de TP: im Sessel sitzen
  EN FP: sitting at a desk
  de FP: am Schreibtisch sitzen
1677 | city (noun): a large crowded area of streets and buildings | loc: Stadt
  EN TS: They are not looking at the city.
  de TS: Sie schauen gar nicht auf die Stadt.
  EN FS: They are not looking at their phones.
  de FS: Sie schauen gar nicht auf ihre Handys.
  EN TP: a city at dusk
  de TP: eine Stadt in der Dämmerung
  EN FP: a city at noon
  de FP: eine Stadt zur Mittagszeit
1679 | temple (noun): a building where people pray | loc: Tempel
  EN TS: The temple is golden.
  de TS: Der Tempel ist golden.
  EN FS: The temple is silver.
  de FS: Der Tempel ist silbern.
  EN TP: a temple by a pond
  de TP: ein Tempel am Teich
  EN FP: a temple in a city
  de FP: ein Tempel in der Stadt
1681 | peacock (noun): a large bird with a long shiny blue-green tail | loc: Pfau
  EN TS: What a long tail, peacock!
  de TS: Was für ein langer Schweif, Pfau!
  EN FS: What a short tail, peacock!
  de FS: Was für ein kurzer Schweif, Pfau!
  EN TP: a peacock on a branch
  de TP: ein Pfau auf einem Ast
  EN FP: a peacock on the ground
  de FP: ein Pfau auf dem Boden
1684 | mask (noun): a cover you wear over your face | loc: Maske
  EN TS: Even the Mona Lisa wears a mask now.
  de TS: Sogar die Mona Lisa trägt jetzt eine Maske.
  EN FS: Even the Mona Lisa wears a hat now.
  de FS: Sogar die Mona Lisa trägt jetzt einen Hut.
  EN TP: a white medical mask
  de TP: eine weiße OP-Maske
  EN FP: a mask for a party
  de FP: eine Maske für die Party
1685 | crowd (noun): a large group of people packed together | loc: Menschenmenge
  EN TS: The crowd is running away!
  de TS: Die Menschenmenge rennt davon!
  EN FS: The crowd is running inside!
  de FS: Die Menschenmenge rennt hinein!
  EN TP: a crowd fleeing the temple
  de TP: Menschenmenge flieht vom Tempel
  EN FP: a crowd praying inside
  de FP: Menschenmenge betet im Tempel
1686 | charge (verb): to fill a phone or battery with electricity | loc: aufladen | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: He is charging himself.
  de TS: Er lädt sich selbst auf.
  EN FS: He is charging his phone.
  de FS: Er lädt sein Handy auf.
  EN TP: charging from a wall socket
  de TP: an der Steckdose aufladen
  EN FP: charging a car battery
  de FP: eine Autobatterie aufladen
1689 | jesus (noun): the central figure of the Christian faith | loc: Jesus
  EN TS: Jesus is standing by a cave.
  de TS: Jesus steht vor einer Höhle.
  EN FS: Jesus is standing by a lake.
  de FS: Jesus steht an einem See.
  EN TP: Jesus by a cave
  de TP: Jesus vor einer Höhle
  EN FP: Jesus by the sea
  de FP: Jesus am Meer
1693 | knight (noun): a soldier in metal armour from the Middle Ages | loc: Ritter
  EN TS: A knight is swinging a sword.
  de TS: Ein Ritter schwingt ein Schwert.
  EN FS: A knight is swinging an axe.
  de FS: Ein Ritter schwingt eine Axt.
  EN TP: a knight in armour
  de TP: ein Ritter in Rüstung
  EN FP: a knight on a horse
  de FP: ein Ritter auf einem Pferd
1694 | chief (noun): the leader of a group or tribe | loc: Häuptling
  EN TS: The chief wears a feather.
  de TS: Der Häuptling trägt eine Feder.
  EN FS: The chief wears a crown.
  de FS: Der Häuptling trägt eine Krone.
  EN TP: a chief with a feather
  de TP: ein Häuptling mit Feder
  EN FP: a chief with a crown
  de FP: ein Häuptling mit Krone
1695 | gun (noun): a weapon that fires a bullet at high speed | loc: Pistole
  EN TS: She is holding a gun.
  de TS: Sie hält eine Pistole.
  EN FS: She is holding a phone.
  de FS: Sie hält ein Handy.
  EN TP: holding a gun down
  de TP: die Pistole gesenkt
  EN FP: holding a gun up
  de FP: die Pistole erhoben
1696 | eagle (noun): a large strong bird that hunts | loc: Adler
  EN TS: The eagle manages two chicks.
  de TS: Der Adler managt zwei Küken.
  EN FS: The eagle manages four chicks.
  de FS: Der Adler managt vier Küken.
  EN TP: an eagle above its nest
  de TP: ein Adler über seinem Nest
  EN FP: an eagle catching a fish
  de FP: ein Adler fängt einen Fisch
1697 | fan (noun): a folding object you wave to move air | loc: Fächer
  EN TS: Fan and kimono: very elegant.
  de TS: Fächer und Kimono: sehr elegant.
  EN FS: Book and kimono: very elegant.
  de FS: Buch und Kimono: sehr elegant.
  EN TP: an open folding fan
  de TP: ein offener Faltfächer
  EN FP: an electric fan in summer
  de FP: ein Ventilator im Sommer
1699 | swim (verb): to move through water with your body | loc: schwimmen
  EN TS: Someone is swimming to the music.
  de TS: Jemand schwimmt zur Musik.
  EN FS: Someone is flying to the music.
  de FS: Jemand fliegt zur Musik.
  EN TP: swimming across calm water
  de TP: über ruhiges Wasser schwimmen
  EN FP: swimming in a pool
  de FP: im Pool schwimmen
1701 | lily (noun): a tall plant with big trumpet-shaped flowers | loc: Lilie
  EN TS: A lily is growing from a jug.
  de TS: Eine Lilie wächst aus einem Krug.
  EN FS: A rose is growing from a jug.
  de FS: Eine Rose wächst aus einem Krug.
  EN TP: a lily in a jug
  de TP: eine Lilie im Krug
  EN FP: a lily in a pond
  de FP: eine Lilie im Teich
1703 | read (verb): to look at written words and understand them | loc: lesen | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: She is reading in the air.
  de TS: Sie liest in der Luft.
  EN FS: She is sleeping in the air.
  de FS: Sie schläft in der Luft.
  EN TP: reading a glowing book
  de TP: ein leuchtendes Buch lesen
  EN FP: reading a text message
  de FP: eine Textnachricht lesen
1704 | christmas (noun): the winter holiday on 25 December | loc: Weihnachten
  EN TS: It says 'happy Christmas'.
  de TS: Da steht „Frohe Weihnachten“.
  EN FS: It says 'happy birthday'.
  de FS: Da steht „Alles Gute zum Geburtstag“.
  EN TP: an old Christmas card
  de TP: eine alte Weihnachtskarte
  EN FP: an old Christmas tree
  de FP: ein alter Weihnachtsbaum
1706 | sunglasses (noun): dark spectacles that protect the eyes from the sun | loc: Sonnenbrille
  EN TS: Cool dog, cool sunglasses.
  de TS: Cooler Hund, coole Sonnenbrille.
  EN FS: Cool dog, cool hat.
  de FS: Cooler Hund, cooler Hut.
  EN TP: a husky in sunglasses
  de TP: ein Husky mit Sonnenbrille
  EN FP: sunglasses on a beach towel
  de FP: Sonnenbrille auf dem Strandtuch
1707 | cottage (noun): a small simple house in the countryside | loc: Häuschen
  EN TS: Plants are eating the cottage.
  de TS: Die Pflanzen fressen das Häuschen.
  EN FS: Plants are eating the church.
  de FS: Die Pflanzen fressen die Kirche.
  EN TP: an overgrown stone cottage
  de TP: ein überwuchertes Steinhäuschen
  EN FP: a cottage by the sea
  de FP: ein Häuschen am Meer
1709 | teacher (noun): a person whose job is teaching | loc: Lehrer | translator note: female form chosen (FP says her desk)
  EN TS: The teacher is explaining.
  de TS: Die Lehrerin erklärt gerade etwas.
  EN FS: The teacher is sleeping.
  de FS: Die Lehrerin schläft gerade.
  EN TP: a teacher at the board
  de TP: eine Lehrerin an der Tafel
  EN FP: a teacher at her desk
  de FP: eine Lehrerin an ihrem Pult
1710 | blackboard (noun): a dark wall surface teachers write on in chalk | loc: Tafel
  EN TS: The blackboard is empty.
  de TS: Die Tafel ist leer.
  EN FS: The blackboard is full.
  de FS: Die Tafel ist voll.
  EN TP: an empty blackboard
  de TP: eine leere Tafel
  EN FP: a blackboard full of notes
  de FP: eine vollgeschriebene Tafel
1711 | skeleton (noun): all the bones of a body together | loc: Skelett
  EN TS: The skeleton looks very happy.
  de TS: Das Skelett sieht echt glücklich aus.
  EN FS: The skeleton looks very sad.
  de FS: Das Skelett sieht echt traurig aus.
  EN TP: a skeleton with a bow
  de TP: ein Skelett mit Schleife
  EN FP: a skeleton in a museum
  de FP: ein Skelett im Museum
1713 | feather (noun): one of the light soft things covering a bird | loc: Feder
  EN TS: Hundreds of feathers on top.
  de TS: Hunderte Federn obendrauf.
  EN FS: Hundreds of flowers on top.
  de FS: Hunderte Blumen obendrauf.
  EN TP: a headdress of long feathers
  de TP: ein Kopfschmuck aus langen Federn
  EN FP: a pillow full of feathers
  de FP: ein Kissen voller Federn
1716 | spacesuit (noun): the sealed suit an astronaut wears in space | loc: Raumanzug
  EN TS: The spacesuit is white.
  de TS: Der Raumanzug ist weiß.
  EN FS: The spacesuit is orange.
  de FS: Der Raumanzug ist orange.
  EN TP: a white spacesuit
  de TP: ein weißer Raumanzug
  EN FP: a spacesuit on a hanger
  de FP: ein Raumanzug auf dem Bügel
1717 | instrument (noun): an object you play to make music | loc: Instrument
  EN TS: This instrument is a violin.
  de TS: Dieses Instrument ist eine Geige.
  EN FS: This instrument is a guitar.
  de FS: Dieses Instrument ist eine Gitarre.
  EN TP: a string instrument
  de TP: ein Saiteninstrument
  EN FP: a wind instrument
  de FP: ein Blasinstrument
1718 | calm (adjective): quiet, relaxed and not worried at all | loc: ruhig
  EN TS: The Buddha is 100 % calm.
  de TS: Der Buddha ist zu 100 % ruhig.
  EN FS: The Buddha is 100 % angry.
  de FS: Der Buddha ist zu 100 % wütend.
  EN TP: a calm face
  de TP: ein ruhiges Gesicht
  EN FP: a calm sea
  de FP: ein ruhiges Meer
1724 | hold (verb): to have something in your hands or grip | loc: halten | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: She is holding the moon!
  de TS: Sie hält den Mond!
  EN FS: She is holding the sun!
  de FS: Sie hält die Sonne!
  EN TP: holding the moon
  de TP: den Mond halten
  EN FP: holding a poppy
  de FP: eine Mohnblume halten
1725 | cross (noun): two crossed beams used to crucify someone | loc: Kreuz
  EN TS: A cross lies on the ground.
  de TS: Ein Kreuz liegt auf dem Boden.
  EN FS: A ladder lies on the ground.
  de FS: Eine Leiter liegt auf dem Boden.
  EN TP: a cross on the ground
  de TP: ein Kreuz auf dem Boden
  EN FP: a cross on a church
  de FP: ein Kreuz auf einer Kirche
1726 | cape (noun): a loose sleeveless coat hanging from the shoulders | loc: Umhang
  EN TS: She is swirling a red cape.
  de TS: Sie wirbelt einen roten Umhang herum.
  EN FS: She is swirling a red scarf.
  de FS: Sie wirbelt einen roten Schal herum.
  EN TP: swirling a red cape
  de TP: einen roten Umhang schwingen
  EN FP: wearing a cape and mask
  de FP: Umhang und Maske tragen
1728 | fan (noun): a folding object you wave to move air | loc: Fächer
  EN TS: Red fan up, leg up!
  de TS: Roter Fächer hoch, Bein hoch!
  EN FS: Red hat up, leg up!
  de FS: Roter Hut hoch, Bein hoch!
  EN TP: waving a red fan
  de TP: mit einem roten Fächer wedeln
  EN FP: a fan on the ceiling
  de FP: ein Ventilator an der Decke
1729 | pet (noun): an animal kept at home for company | loc: Haustier
  EN TS: She has two pets.
  de TS: Sie hat zwei Haustiere.
  EN FS: She has three pets.
  de FS: Sie hat drei Haustiere.
  EN TP: a girl with her pets
  de TP: ein Mädchen mit ihren Haustieren
  EN FP: a girl buying a pet
  de FP: ein Mädchen kauft ein Haustier
1731 | arrow (noun): the thin feathered stick you shoot from a bow | loc: Pfeil
  EN TS: An arrow hit her flag!
  de TS: Ein Pfeil hat ihre Fahne getroffen!
  EN FS: An arrow hit her horse!
  de FS: Ein Pfeil hat ihr Pferd getroffen!
  EN TP: arrows in a flag
  de TP: Pfeile in einer Fahne
  EN FP: arrows in a target
  de FP: Pfeile in einer Zielscheibe
1733 | elf (noun): a magical creature with pointed ears | loc: Elf
  EN TS: Guess what the elf is holding? A light.
  de TS: Rate mal, was der Elf hält? Ein Licht.
  EN FS: Guess what the elf is holding? A sword.
  de FS: Rate mal, was der Elf hält? Ein Schwert.
  EN TP: an elf with pointed ears
  de TP: ein Elf mit spitzen Ohren
  EN FP: an elf with a bow
  de FP: ein Elf mit Bogen
1734 | superhero (noun): a caped character with special powers | loc: Superheld
  EN TS: This superhero is Spider-Man.
  de TS: Dieser Superheld ist Spider-Man.
  EN FS: This superhero is Batman.
  de FS: Dieser Superheld ist Batman.
  EN TP: a superhero in a mask
  de TP: ein Superheld mit Maske
  EN FP: a superhero with a cape
  de FP: ein Superheld mit Umhang
1738 | veil (noun): a piece of cloth that covers the head | loc: der Schleier
  EN TS: She wears a long dark veil.
  de TS: Sie trägt einen langen dunklen Schleier.
  EN FS: She wears a long white veil.
  de FS: Sie trägt einen langen weißen Schleier.
  EN TP: a long dark veil
  de TP: ein langer dunkler Schleier
  EN FP: a wedding veil
  de FP: ein Brautschleier
1741 | emperor (noun): the man who rules a whole empire | loc: Kaiser
  EN TS: The emperor wears a wreath.
  de TS: Der Kaiser trägt einen Kranz.
  EN FS: The emperor wears a crown.
  de FS: Der Kaiser trägt eine Krone.
  EN TP: an emperor with a wreath
  de TP: ein Kaiser mit Kranz
  EN FP: an emperor on a horse
  de FP: ein Kaiser zu Pferd
1742 | shield (noun): a flat piece of armour held for protection | loc: Schild
  EN TS: The angel is holding a shield.
  de TS: Der Engel hält einen Schild.
  EN FS: The angel is holding a sword.
  de FS: Der Engel hält ein Schwert.
  EN TP: a large round shield
  de TP: ein großer runder Schild
  EN FP: a shield on the ground
  de FP: ein Schild auf dem Boden
1743 | italy (noun): a country in southern Europe, home of pizza | loc: Italien
  EN TS: Ice cream in Italy? Of course.
  de TS: Eis in Italien? Na klar.
  EN FS: Pizza in Italy? Of course.
  de FS: Pizza in Italien? Na klar.
  EN TP: a leaning tower in Italy
  de TP: ein schiefer Turm in Italien
  EN FP: a pizza oven in Italy
  de FP: ein Pizzaofen in Italien
1747 | tent (noun): a shelter of cloth stretched over poles | loc: Zelt
  EN TS: Best tent spot ever!
  de TS: Bester Zeltplatz ever!
  EN FS: Best beach spot ever!
  de FS: Bester Strandplatz ever!
  EN TP: a tent on a hill
  de TP: ein Zelt auf einem Hügel
  EN FP: a tent on a beach
  de FP: ein Zelt am Strand
1751 | sign (noun): a big board that shows advertisements | loc: Schild
  EN TS: Each sign shows a landscape.
  de TS: Jedes Schild zeigt eine Landschaft.
  EN FS: Each sign shows a city.
  de FS: Jedes Schild zeigt eine Stadt.
  EN TP: arrow signs with landscapes
  de TP: Pfeilschilder mit Landschaften
  EN FP: arrow signs with prices
  de FP: Pfeilschilder mit Preisen
1752 | windmill (noun): a building with big sails turned by the wind | loc: die Windmühle
  EN TS: The windmill windows are lit.
  de TS: Die Fenster der Windmühle leuchten.
  EN FS: The windmill windows are open.
  de FS: Die Fenster der Windmühle sind offen.
  EN TP: a windmill by a lake
  de TP: eine Windmühle am See
  EN FP: a windmill in a field
  de FP: eine Windmühle auf einem Feld
1756 | argue (verb): to speak angrily with someone you disagree with | loc: streiten
  EN TS: They are arguing on the phone.
  de TS: Sie streiten am Telefon.
  EN FS: They are singing on the phone.
  de FS: Sie singen am Telefon.
  EN TP: arguing on the phone
  de TP: am Telefon streiten
  EN FP: arguing in the kitchen
  de FP: in der Küche streiten
1757 | blossom (noun): a flower on a tree, like cherry blossom | loc: Blüte
  EN TS: Music under the blossoms? Romantic.
  de TS: Musik unter den Blüten? Romantisch.
  EN FS: Dancing under the blossoms? Romantic.
  de FS: Tanzen unter den Blüten? Romantisch.
  EN TP: pink cherry blossoms
  de TP: rosa Kirschblüten
  EN FP: cherry blossom tea
  de FP: Kirschblütentee
1762 | whale (noun): a huge sea animal that breathes air | loc: Wal
  EN TS: A man is falling into a whale!
  de TS: Ein Mann fällt in einen Wal!
  EN FS: A man is falling into a boat!
  de FS: Ein Mann fällt in ein Boot!
  EN TP: the mouth of a whale
  de TP: das Maul eines Wals
  EN FP: a whale in an aquarium
  de FP: ein Wal im Aquarium
1765 | greedy (adjective): wanting far more money than you need | loc: gierig
  EN TS: So greedy! Hands off the gold!
  de TS: So gierig! Finger weg vom Gold!
  EN FS: So greedy! Hands off the cake!
  de FS: So gierig! Finger weg vom Kuchen!
  EN TP: a greedy man with coins
  de TP: ein gieriger Mann mit Münzen
  EN FP: a greedy dog with food
  de FP: ein gieriger Hund mit Futter
1766 | blackberry (noun): a dark fruit made of many little parts | loc: Brombeere
  EN TS: Black and red blackberries.
  de TS: Schwarze und rote Brombeeren.
  EN FS: Black and green blackberries.
  de FS: Schwarze und grüne Brombeeren.
  EN TP: ripe blackberries on a branch
  de TP: reife Brombeeren am Zweig
  EN FP: blackberries in a pie
  de FP: Brombeeren im Kuchen
1777 | banjo (noun): a round-bodied string instrument | loc: Banjo
  EN TS: This dude is playing the banjo.
  de TS: Der Typ spielt Banjo.
  EN FS: This dude is playing the drums.
  de FS: Der Typ spielt Schlagzeug.
  EN TP: playing a banjo
  de TP: Banjo spielen
  EN FP: tuning a banjo
  de FP: ein Banjo stimmen
1779 | chain (noun): a row of metal rings joined together | loc: Kette
  EN TS: His chain is out of control!
  de TS: Seine Kette ist außer Kontrolle!
  EN FS: His rope is out of control!
  de FS: Sein Seil ist außer Kontrolle!
  EN TP: a chain whipping around him
  de TP: eine Kette wirbelt um ihn
  EN FP: a chain around his neck
  de FP: eine Kette um seinen Hals
1780 | bike (noun): a vehicle with two wheels that you pedal | loc: Rad
  EN TS: A dog is chasing his bike!
  de TS: Ein Hund jagt sein Rad!
  EN FS: A cat is chasing his bike!
  de FS: Eine Katze jagt sein Rad!
  EN TP: a bike ride downhill
  de TP: eine Radtour bergab
  EN FP: a bike ride uphill
  de FP: eine Radtour bergauf
1781 | halloween (noun): the autumn night of scary costumes and pumpkins | loc: Halloween
  EN TS: Halloween every day in this house.
  de TS: Jeden Tag Halloween in diesem Haus.
  EN FS: Halloween every day in this castle.
  de FS: Jeden Tag Halloween in diesem Schloss.
  EN TP: a Halloween haunted house
  de TP: ein Halloween-Spukhaus
  EN FP: a Halloween party at school
  de FP: eine Halloween-Party in der Schule
1783 | child (noun): a young person, a boy or a girl | loc: Kind
  EN TS: Four children, one lap, a hug for each child.
  de TS: Vier Kinder, ein Schoß, eine Umarmung für jedes Kind.
  EN FS: Four children, one lap, a gift for each child.
  de FS: Vier Kinder, ein Schoß, ein Geschenk für jedes Kind.
  EN TP: a man hugging each child
  de TP: ein Mann umarmt jedes Kind
  EN FP: a man teaching each child
  de FP: ein Mann unterrichtet jedes Kind
1785 | beautiful (adjective): delighting the senses, very nice to look at | loc: schön
  EN TS: This is a beautiful drawing.
  de TS: Das ist eine schöne Zeichnung.
  EN FS: This is a beautiful photo.
  de FS: Das ist ein schönes Foto.
  EN TP: a beautiful portrait
  de TP: ein schönes Porträt
  EN FP: a beautiful sunset
  de FP: ein schöner Sonnenuntergang
1786 | meteor (noun): a space rock that burns as it falls | loc: Meteor
  EN TS: Meteors are falling like rain.
  de TS: Meteore fallen wie Regen.
  EN FS: Leaves are falling like rain.
  de FS: Blätter fallen wie Regen.
  EN TP: meteors raining down
  de TP: herabregnende Meteore
  EN FP: a meteor in a museum
  de FP: ein Meteor im Museum
1787 | streetlight (noun): a tall lamp that lights a street at night | loc: Straßenlaterne
  EN TS: Red scarf under a streetlight. Stylish.
  de TS: Roter Schal unter der Straßenlaterne. Stylish.
  EN FS: Blue scarf under a streetlight. Stylish.
  de FS: Blauer Schal unter der Straßenlaterne. Stylish.
  EN TP: a glowing streetlight
  de TP: eine leuchtende Straßenlaterne
  EN FP: a broken streetlight
  de FP: eine kaputte Straßenlaterne
1788 | monster (noun): a frightening creature that is not real | loc: Monster
  EN TS: A sea monster with passengers!
  de TS: Ein Seemonster mit Passagieren!
  EN FS: A sea turtle with passengers!
  de FS: Eine Meeresschildkröte mit Passagieren!
  EN TP: a sea monster rising
  de TP: ein Seemonster taucht auf
  EN FP: a monster under the bed
  de FP: ein Monster unterm Bett
1792 | build (verb): to make something by combining parts | loc: bauen
  EN TS: They are building a tower.
  de TS: Sie bauen einen Turm.
  EN FS: They are building a ship.
  de FS: Sie bauen ein Schiff.
  EN TP: to build a huge tower
  de TP: einen riesigen Turm bauen
  EN FP: to build a small house
  de FP: ein kleines Haus bauen
1794 | feather (noun): one of the light soft things covering a bird | loc: Feder
  EN TS: So many peacock feathers!
  de TS: So viele Pfauenfedern!
  EN FS: So many swan feathers!
  de FS: So viele Schwanenfedern!
  EN TP: shimmering peacock feathers
  de TP: schimmernde Pfauenfedern
  EN FP: a feather in a pillow
  de FP: eine Feder im Kissen
1799 | cello (noun): a large string instrument played sitting down | loc: Cello
  EN TS: The cello is the largest one.
  de TS: Das Cello ist das größte.
  EN FS: The violin is the largest one.
  de FS: Die Geige ist die größte.
  EN TP: a large dark cello
  de TP: ein großes dunkles Cello
  EN FP: a small dark cello
  de FP: ein kleines dunkles Cello
1800 | hide (verb): to keep yourself or something from being seen | loc: verstecken
  EN TS: They are hiding a smile.
  de TS: Sie verstecken ein Lächeln.
  EN FS: They are hiding a phone.
  de FS: Sie verstecken ein Handy.
  EN TP: hiding behind a book
  de TP: sich hinter einem Buch verstecken
  EN FP: hiding under a table
  de FP: sich unter einem Tisch verstecken
1802 | note (noun): a sign for a single sound in written music | loc: Note
  EN TS: Notes are pouring out of the guitar!
  de TS: Noten strömen aus der Gitarre!
  EN FS: Coins are pouring out of the guitar!
  de FS: Münzen strömen aus der Gitarre!
  EN TP: a waterfall of notes
  de TP: ein Wasserfall aus Noten
  EN FP: a stack of notes
  de FP: ein Stapel Noten
1803 | throw (verb): to send something through the air | loc: werfen
  EN TS: He is going to throw the ball.
  de TS: Er wird gleich den Ball werfen.
  EN FS: He is going to kick the ball.
  de FS: Er wird gleich den Ball kicken.
  EN TP: about to throw the ball
  de TP: gleich den Ball werfen
  EN FP: to throw a party
  de FP: eine Party schmeißen
1806 | bun (noun): hair twisted into a round knot on the head | loc: Dutt
  EN TS: Two buns? She is so trendy.
  de TS: Zwei Dutts? Sie ist so trendy.
  EN FS: Two bows? She is so trendy.
  de FS: Zwei Schleifen? Sie ist so trendy.
  EN TP: hair in two round buns
  de TP: Haare in zwei runden Dutts
  EN FP: two buns on a plate
  de FP: zwei Brötchen auf einem Teller
1807 | skull (noun): the bones that form the head | loc: Schädel
  EN TS: Skulls are floating around her.
  de TS: Schädel schweben um sie herum.
  EN FS: Hearts are floating around her.
  de FS: Herzen schweben um sie herum.
  EN TP: skulls in pink flames
  de TP: Schädel in rosa Flammen
  EN FP: skulls on a pirate flag
  de FP: Schädel auf einer Piratenflagge
1808 | headset (noun): a device worn on the head over eyes or ears | loc: Headset
  EN TS: His headset is huge, bro.
  de TS: Sein Headset ist riesig, Bro.
  EN FS: His hat is huge, bro.
  de FS: Sein Hut ist riesig, Bro.
  EN TP: a chunky headset
  de TP: ein klobiges Headset
  EN FP: a headset on a pilot
  de FP: ein Pilot mit Headset
1811 | raincoat (noun): a waterproof coat you wear in the rain | loc: Regenmantel
  EN TS: The raincoat is doing its job.
  de TS: Der Regenmantel macht seinen Job.
  EN FS: The umbrella is doing its job.
  de FS: Der Regenschirm macht seinen Job.
  EN TP: a long yellow raincoat
  de TP: ein langer gelber Regenmantel
  EN FP: a raincoat on a hook
  de FP: ein Regenmantel am Haken
1812 | look (verb): to turn your eyes toward something | loc: schauen
  EN TS: The cat is looking out too.
  de TS: Die Katze schaut auch raus.
  EN FS: The dog is looking out too.
  de FS: Der Hund schaut auch raus.
  EN TP: looking out of the window
  de TP: aus dem Fenster schauen
  EN FP: to look after a cat
  de FP: nach einer Katze schauen
1823 | lonely (adjective): sad because you are all alone | loc: einsam
  EN TS: She feels lonely tonight.
  de TS: Sie fühlt sich heute Nacht einsam.
  EN FS: She feels lonely this morning.
  de FS: Sie fühlt sich heute Morgen einsam.
  EN TP: lonely on a balcony
  de TP: einsam auf dem Balkon
  EN FP: lonely in a crowd
  de FP: einsam in der Menge
1827 | math (noun): the study of numbers and shapes | loc: Mathe
  EN TS: The cat hates math.
  de TS: Die Katze hasst Mathe.
  EN FS: The dog hates math.
  de FS: Der Hund hasst Mathe.
  EN TP: walls covered in math
  de TP: Wände voller Mathe
  EN FP: math books on the floor
  de FP: Mathebücher auf dem Boden
1831 | light bulb (noun): a glass ball in a lamp that glows when switched on | loc: Glühbirne
  EN TS: A cabin is in the light bulb.
  de TS: In der Glühbirne ist eine Hütte.
  EN FS: A cabin is in the teacup.
  de FS: In der Teetasse ist eine Hütte.
  EN TP: a snowy light bulb
  de TP: eine verschneite Glühbirne
  EN FP: a broken light bulb
  de FP: eine kaputte Glühbirne
1832 | take a photo (phrase): to make a picture with a camera or phone | loc: ein Foto machen
  EN TS: She is taking a photo. Cool!
  de TS: Sie macht ein Foto. Cool!
  EN FS: She is making a call. Cool!
  de FS: Sie telefoniert. Cool!
  EN TP: taking a photo at night
  de TP: nachts ein Foto machen
  EN FP: taking a photo indoors
  de FP: drinnen ein Foto machen
1833 | lean (verb): to rest your body sideways on something | loc: lehnen
  EN TS: He is leaning on his guitar.
  de TS: Er lehnt an seiner Gitarre.
  EN FS: He is leaning on his piano.
  de FS: Er lehnt an seinem Klavier.
  EN TP: leaning on a guitar
  de TP: an einer Gitarre lehnen
  EN FP: leaning on a tree
  de FP: an einem Baum lehnen
1834 | teach (verb): to help someone learn a skill or subject | loc: lehren
  EN TS: A god is teaching a warrior.
  de TS: Ein Gott lehrt einen Krieger.
  EN FS: A god is teaching a child.
  de FS: Ein Gott lehrt ein Kind.
  EN TP: teaching a warrior
  de TP: einen Krieger lehren
  EN FP: teaching a crowd
  de FP: eine Menschenmenge lehren
1840 | machine (noun): a thing with moving metal parts built to work | loc: Maschine
  EN TS: A giant machine made of gears!
  de TS: Eine Riesenmaschine aus Zahnrädern!
  EN FS: A giant machine made of wood!
  de FS: Eine Riesenmaschine aus Holz!
  EN TP: a machine of rusty gears
  de TP: eine Maschine aus rostigen Zahnrädern
  EN FP: a coffee machine
  de FP: eine Kaffeemaschine
1843 | neighborhood (noun): the streets and houses around your home | loc: Nachbarschaft
  EN TS: A snowy neighborhood at night.
  de TS: Eine verschneite Nachbarschaft bei Nacht.
  EN FS: A snowy neighborhood at noon.
  de FS: Eine verschneite Nachbarschaft am Mittag.
  EN TP: a snowy neighborhood
  de TP: eine verschneite Nachbarschaft
  EN FP: a neighborhood party
  de FP: ein Nachbarschaftsfest
1846 | crane (noun): a large white bird with a long neck and legs | loc: Kranich
  EN TS: A crane is flying by the sun.
  de TS: Ein Kranich fliegt an der Sonne vorbei.
  EN FS: A crane is flying by the moon.
  de FS: Ein Kranich fliegt am Mond vorbei.
  EN TP: a flying white crane
  de TP: ein fliegender weißer Kranich
  EN FP: a crane lifting boxes
  de FP: ein Kran hebt Kisten
1847 | christmas tree (noun): a pine decorated with lights for the holidays | loc: Weihnachtsbaum
  EN TS: I count three Christmas trees.
  de TS: Ich zähle drei Weihnachtsbäume.
  EN FS: I count five Christmas trees.
  de FS: Ich zähle fünf Weihnachtsbäume.
  EN TP: three little Christmas trees
  de TP: drei kleine Weihnachtsbäume
  EN FP: a Christmas tree with gifts
  de FP: ein Weihnachtsbaum mit Geschenken
1849 | magic (noun): power that makes impossible things happen | loc: Magie
  EN TS: Her magic is glowing!
  de TS: Ihre Magie leuchtet!
  EN FS: Her hair is glowing!
  de FS: Ihr Haar leuchtet!
  EN TP: glowing blue magic
  de TP: leuchtend blaue Magie
  EN FP: a magic card trick
  de FP: ein magischer Kartentrick
1851 | valley (noun): the low land between mountains | loc: das Tal | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: Mist swallows the valleys.
  de TS: Nebel verschluckt die Täler.
  EN FS: Snow swallows the valleys.
  de FS: Schnee verschluckt die Täler.
  EN TP: mist in the valley
  de TP: Nebel im Tal
  EN FP: a valley full of houses
  de FP: ein Tal voller Häuser
1853 | dragon (noun): a huge scaly beast from old stories | loc: Drache
  EN TS: The dragon is breathing fire.
  de TS: Der Drache speit Feuer.
  EN FS: The dragon is breathing ice.
  de FS: Der Drache speit Eis.
  EN TP: a small white dragon
  de TP: ein kleiner weißer Drache
  EN FP: a big green dragon
  de FP: ein großer grüner Drache
1854 | string (noun): one of the thin wires you pluck on a guitar | loc: Saite
  EN TS: The guitar has white strings.
  de TS: Die Gitarre hat weiße Saiten.
  EN FS: The guitar has black strings.
  de FS: Die Gitarre hat schwarze Saiten.
  EN TP: white strings on a guitar
  de TP: weiße Saiten an einer Gitarre
  EN FP: white strings on a kite
  de FP: weiße Schnüre an einem Drachen
1855 | tail (noun): the part at the back end of an animal's body | loc: Schwanz
  EN TS: The peacock has a huge tail!
  de TS: Der Pfau hat einen riesigen Schwanz!
  EN FS: The peacock has a short tail!
  de FS: Der Pfau hat einen kurzen Schwanz!
  EN TP: a peacock showing its tail
  de TP: ein Pfau zeigt seinen Schwanz
  EN FP: a peacock hiding its tail
  de FP: ein Pfau versteckt seinen Schwanz
1856 | tiny (adjective): very, very small | loc: winzig
  EN TS: The figure is tiny. The sky is big.
  de TS: Die Figur ist winzig. Der Himmel ist groß.
  EN FS: The figure is huge. The sky is big.
  de FS: Die Figur ist riesig. Der Himmel ist groß.
  EN TP: a tiny figure on grass
  de TP: eine winzige Figur im Gras
  EN FP: a tiny shelf figure
  de FP: eine winzige Regalfigur
1857 | easter (noun): the spring holiday when Christians remember Jesus | loc: Ostern
  EN TS: This is an Easter poster.
  de TS: Das ist ein Plakat für Ostern.
  EN FS: This is a Christmas poster.
  de FS: Das ist ein Plakat für Weihnachten.
  EN TP: an Easter poster
  de TP: ein Plakat für Ostern
  EN FP: an Easter egg hunt
  de FP: eine Ostereiersuche
1858 | scarf (noun): a long piece of cloth you wear around your neck | loc: Schal
  EN TS: The child has a long scarf and a big balloon.
  de TS: Das Kind hat einen langen Schal und einen großen Ballon.
  EN FS: The child has a long sword and a big balloon.
  de FS: Das Kind hat ein langes Schwert und einen großen Ballon.
  EN TP: a long striped scarf
  de TP: ein langer gestreifter Schal
  EN FP: a scarf in a drawer
  de FP: ein Schal in der Schublade
1860 | stack (noun): a neat pile of things placed on top of each other | loc: Stapel
  EN TS: His head is a stack of books.
  de TS: Sein Kopf ist ein Stapel Bücher.
  EN FS: His head is a stack of plates.
  de FS: Sein Kopf ist ein Stapel Teller.
  EN TP: a stack of books
  de TP: ein Stapel Bücher
  EN FP: a stack of boxes
  de FP: ein Stapel Kisten
1861 | antique (adjective): old, valuable and from an earlier time | loc: antik
  EN TS: This antique seat has a swan.
  de TS: Dieser antike Sitz hat einen Schwan.
  EN FS: This antique seat has a lion.
  de FS: Dieser antike Sitz hat einen Löwen.
  EN TP: an antique carved seat
  de TP: ein antiker geschnitzter Sitz
  EN FP: an antique carved clock
  de FP: eine antike geschnitzte Uhr
1862 | vase (noun): a container you put flowers in | loc: die Vase
  EN TS: The vase has pink roses.
  de TS: In der Vase sind rosa Rosen.
  EN FS: The vase has white roses.
  de FS: In der Vase sind weiße Rosen.
  EN TP: a grey classical vase
  de TP: eine graue klassische Vase
  EN FP: a broken classical vase
  de FP: eine zerbrochene klassische Vase
1863 | hang (verb): to attach something high up so it drops down | loc: hängen
  EN TS: The swing hangs from the moon!
  de TS: Die Schaukel hängt am Mond!
  EN FS: The swing hangs from a tree!
  de FS: Die Schaukel hängt an einem Baum!
  EN TP: hanging from the moon
  de TP: am Mond hängen
  EN FP: hanging from a tree
  de FP: an einem Baum hängen
1865 | fin (noun): the thin part a fish uses to swim | loc: Flosse
  EN TS: Those blue fins? Pure fashion.
  de TS: Diese blauen Flossen? Pure Fashion.
  EN FS: Those red fins? Pure fashion.
  de FS: Diese roten Flossen? Pure Fashion.
  EN TP: big flowing fins
  de TP: große wallende Flossen
  EN FP: fins on a diver
  de FP: ein Taucher mit Flossen
1866 | spy (noun): a person who secretly finds out information | loc: Spion
  EN TS: Sunglasses and a gun: a classic spy.
  de TS: Sonnenbrille und Pistole: ein klassischer Spion.
  EN FS: Sunglasses and a knife: a classic spy.
  de FS: Sonnenbrille und Messer: ein klassischer Spion.
  EN TP: a spy with a pistol
  de TP: ein Spion mit Pistole
  EN FP: a spy with a camera
  de FP: ein Spion mit Kamera
1868 | justice (noun): fair treatment of people by the law | loc: Gerechtigkeit
  EN TS: Justice needs a lot of heavy books.
  de TS: Gerechtigkeit braucht viele schwere Bücher.
  EN FS: Justice needs a lot of candles.
  de FS: Gerechtigkeit braucht viele Kerzen.
  EN TP: the scales of justice
  de TP: die Waage der Gerechtigkeit
  EN FP: the sword of justice
  de FP: das Schwert der Gerechtigkeit
1870 | hair (noun): the threadlike growth covering the head | loc: Haare
  EN TS: Her hair reaches her feet!
  de TS: Ihre Haare reichen bis zu den Füßen!
  EN FS: Her hair reaches her chin!
  de FS: Ihre Haare reichen bis zum Kinn!
  EN TP: very long dark hair
  de TP: sehr lange dunkle Haare
  EN FP: a hair in the soup
  de FP: ein Haar in der Suppe
1871 | glow (verb): to shine with a soft light | loc: leuchten
  EN TS: Her eye is glowing white.
  de TS: Ihr Auge leuchtet weiß.
  EN FS: Her eye is glowing red.
  de FS: Ihr Auge leuchtet rot.
  EN TP: an eye glowing white
  de TP: ein weiß leuchtendes Auge
  EN FP: a lamp glowing white
  de FP: eine weiß leuchtende Lampe
1872 | black (adjective): having the darkest color, like night | loc: schwarz
  EN TS: The black cat loves books.
  de TS: Die schwarze Katze liebt Bücher.
  EN FS: The white cat loves books.
  de FS: Die weiße Katze liebt Bücher.
  EN TP: a black cat on books
  de TP: eine schwarze Katze auf Büchern
  EN FP: a black cat outside
  de FP: eine schwarze Katze draußen
1874 | pier (noun): a wooden platform built out over the water | loc: Steg
  EN TS: They are sitting on the pier.
  de TS: Sie sitzen auf dem Steg.
  EN FS: They are sitting on the boat.
  de FS: Sie sitzen auf dem Boot.
  EN TP: sitting on a pier
  de TP: auf einem Steg sitzen
  EN FP: sitting on a bridge
  de FP: auf einer Brücke sitzen
1876 | fishbowl (noun): a round glass bowl where pet fish live | loc: Goldfischglas
  EN TS: Cheap helmet: a fishbowl.
  de TS: Billiger Helm: ein Goldfischglas.
  EN FS: Cheap helmet: a bucket.
  de FS: Billiger Helm: ein Eimer.
  EN TP: a fishbowl on her head
  de TP: ein Goldfischglas auf dem Kopf
  EN FP: a fishbowl on the table
  de FP: ein Goldfischglas auf dem Tisch
1878 | invisible (adjective): impossible to see with your eyes | loc: unsichtbar
  EN TS: His head is invisible!
  de TS: Sein Kopf ist unsichtbar!
  EN FS: His suit is invisible!
  de FS: Sein Anzug ist unsichtbar!
  EN TP: an invisible head
  de TP: ein unsichtbarer Kopf
  EN FP: an invisible hand
  de FP: eine unsichtbare Hand
1879 | dome (noun): a round roof shaped like half a ball | loc: Kuppel
  EN TS: The dome shines like gold.
  de TS: Die Kuppel glänzt wie Gold.
  EN FS: The dome shines like silver.
  de FS: Die Kuppel glänzt wie Silber.
  EN TP: a golden dome
  de TP: eine goldene Kuppel
  EN FP: a glass dome
  de FP: eine Glaskuppel
1880 | invention (noun): a new machine that someone has created | loc: Erfindung
  EN TS: Best invention ever: a flying ship.
  de TS: Beste Erfindung ever: ein fliegendes Schiff.
  EN FS: Best invention ever: a flying car.
  de FS: Beste Erfindung ever: ein fliegendes Auto.
  EN TP: a flying invention
  de TP: eine fliegende Erfindung
  EN FP: an invention on wheels
  de FP: eine Erfindung auf Rädern
1881 | meditate (verb): to sit quietly and calm your mind | loc: meditieren
  EN TS: She is meditating calmly.
  de TS: Sie meditiert ganz ruhig.
  EN FS: She is sleeping calmly.
  de FS: Sie schläft ganz ruhig.
  EN TP: meditating in lotus position
  de TP: im Lotussitz meditieren
  EN FP: meditating before an exam
  de FP: vor einer Prüfung meditieren
1883 | hen (noun): a female chicken | loc: Henne
  EN TS: The hens are eating outside.
  de TS: Die Hennen fressen draußen.
  EN FS: The hens are eating inside.
  de FS: Die Hennen fressen drinnen.
  EN TP: hens in a farmyard
  de TP: Hennen auf dem Hof
  EN FP: hens in a kitchen
  de FP: Hennen in einer Küche
1884 | reflection (noun): the mirror image seen in water or glass | loc: Spiegelung
  EN TS: The reflection is upside down.
  de TS: Die Spiegelung steht auf dem Kopf.
  EN FS: The reflection is very blurry.
  de FS: Die Spiegelung ist total verschwommen.
  EN TP: a reflection in still water
  de TP: eine Spiegelung im stillen Wasser
  EN FP: a reflection in a mirror
  de FP: eine Spiegelung im Spiegel
1885 | rich (adjective): having a lot of money and material wealth | loc: reich
  EN TS: The rich man is on top.
  de TS: Der reiche Mann ist ganz oben.
  EN FS: The rich man is at the bottom.
  de FS: Der reiche Mann ist ganz unten.
  EN TP: a rich man on top
  de TP: ein reicher Mann ganz oben
  EN FP: a rich man in prison
  de FP: ein reicher Mann im Gefängnis
1886 | consumer (noun): a person who buys and uses goods | loc: Verbraucher
  EN TS: The consumer's plate is empty.
  de TS: Der Teller des Verbrauchers ist leer.
  EN FS: The consumer's plate is full.
  de FS: Der Teller des Verbrauchers ist voll.
  EN TP: a hungry consumer
  de TP: ein hungriger Verbraucher
  EN FP: a consumer in a shop
  de FP: ein Verbraucher im Laden
1887 | push (verb): to move something with force | loc: schieben
  EN TS: He is pushing a heavy cart.
  de TS: Er schiebt einen schweren Karren.
  EN FS: He is pushing a heavy car.
  de FS: Er schiebt ein schweres Auto.
  EN TP: pushing an overloaded cart
  de TP: einen überladenen Karren schieben
  EN FP: pushing a baby buggy
  de FP: einen Kinderwagen schieben
1889 | move (verb): to change location, to travel or proceed | loc: sich bewegen
  EN TS: She is moving like lightning!
  de TS: Sie bewegt sich wie der Blitz!
  EN FS: She is sitting like a statue!
  de FS: Sie sitzt da wie eine Statue!
  EN TP: moving to the music
  de TP: sich zur Musik bewegen
  EN FP: moving to a new flat
  de FP: in eine neue Wohnung ziehen
1892 | old (adjective): having lived for a long time | loc: alt
  EN TS: The old man has a thin stick.
  de TS: Der alte Mann hat einen dünnen Stock.
  EN FS: The old man has an umbrella.
  de FS: Der alte Mann hat einen Regenschirm.
  EN TP: the old man's stick
  de TP: der Stock des alten Mannes
  EN FP: the old man's umbrella
  de FP: der Regenschirm des alten Mannes
1894 | hedgehog (noun): a small animal covered in sharp spines | loc: Igel
  EN TS: Sleep well, little hedgehogs.
  de TS: Schlaft gut, kleine Igel.
  EN FS: Sleep well, little rabbits.
  de FS: Schlaft gut, kleine Hasen.
  EN TP: a hedgehog family in bed
  de TP: eine Igelfamilie im Bett
  EN FP: a hedgehog in a garden
  de FP: ein Igel im Garten
1897 | pumpkin (noun): a big round orange vegetable with thick skin | loc: Kürbis
  EN TS: The crow owns these pumpkins.
  de TS: Die Krähe besitzt diese Kürbisse.
  EN FS: The cat owns these pumpkins.
  de FS: Die Katze besitzt diese Kürbisse.
  EN TP: three stacked pumpkins
  de TP: drei gestapelte Kürbisse
  EN FP: a pumpkin pie
  de FP: ein Kürbiskuchen
1899 | ruins (noun): the broken remains of old buildings | loc: Ruinen
  EN TS: Two giants sit near the ruins.
  de TS: Zwei Riesen sitzen bei den Ruinen.
  EN FS: Two lions sit near the ruins.
  de FS: Zwei Löwen sitzen bei den Ruinen.
  EN TP: ruins of old temples
  de TP: Ruinen alter Tempel
  EN FP: ruins of a castle
  de FP: Ruinen einer Burg
1905 | curious (adjective): wanting to know what is going on | loc: neugierig
  EN TS: These cats are so curious!
  de TS: Diese Katzen sind so neugierig!
  EN FS: These dogs are so curious!
  de FS: Diese Hunde sind so neugierig!
  EN TP: three curious cats
  de TP: drei neugierige Katzen
  EN FP: three sleepy cats
  de FP: drei verschlafene Katzen
1906 | blue (adjective): the color between green and violet | loc: blau
  EN TS: Her hair is blue.
  de TS: Ihre Haare sind blau.
  EN FS: Her hair is red.
  de FS: Ihre Haare sind rot.
  EN TP: long blue hair
  de TP: lange blaue Haare
  EN FP: a blue summer dress
  de FP: ein blaues Sommerkleid
1908 | heron (noun): a tall water bird with long legs and beak | loc: Reiher
  EN TS: Bro, the heron is chilling.
  de TS: Bro, der Reiher chillt.
  EN FS: Bro, the swan is chilling.
  de FS: Bro, der Schwan chillt.
  EN TP: a heron on a branch
  de TP: ein Reiher auf einem Ast
  EN FP: a heron in the water
  de FP: ein Reiher im Wasser
1909 | blade (noun): the flat cutting part of a knife | loc: Klinge
  EN TS: Her blade is shining.
  de TS: Ihre Klinge glänzt.
  EN FS: Her blade is rusty.
  de FS: Ihre Klinge ist rostig.
  EN TP: a long steel blade
  de TP: eine lange Stahlklinge
  EN FP: a short broken blade
  de FP: eine kurze, abgebrochene Klinge
1910 | petal (noun): one of the soft colored parts of a flower | loc: Blütenblatt
  EN TS: She has so many pink petals.
  de TS: Sie hat so viele rosa Blütenblätter.
  EN FS: She has so many pink feathers.
  de FS: Sie hat so viele rosa Federn.
  EN TP: large pink petals
  de TP: große rosa Blütenblätter
  EN FP: petals on the floor
  de FP: Blütenblätter auf dem Boden
1911 | princess (noun): the daughter of a king or queen | loc: Prinzessin
  EN TS: This princess has great style.
  de TS: Diese Prinzessin hat echt Stil.
  EN FS: This prince has great style.
  de FS: Dieser Prinz hat echt Stil.
  EN TP: a princess in blue
  de TP: eine Prinzessin in Blau
  EN FP: a princess in red
  de FP: eine Prinzessin in Rot
1912 | tattoo (noun): a permanent picture inked into the skin | loc: Tattoo
  EN TS: Her tattoos are blue.
  de TS: Ihre Tattoos sind blau.
  EN FS: Her tattoos are red.
  de FS: Ihre Tattoos sind rot.
  EN TP: swirling blue face tattoos
  de TP: verschlungene blaue Gesichtstattoos
  EN FP: a tattoo on her hand
  de FP: ein Tattoo auf ihrer Hand
1914 | piano (noun): a large instrument you play by pressing keys | loc: Klavier
  EN TS: The piano is open. Hungry?
  de TS: Das Klavier ist offen. Hunger?
  EN FS: The door is open. Hungry?
  de FS: Die Tür ist offen. Hunger?
  EN TP: an open grand piano
  de TP: ein aufgeklapptes Klavier
  EN FP: a piano lesson
  de FP: eine Klavierstunde
1915 | bass (noun): the biggest string instrument, deepest sound | loc: Kontrabass
  EN TS: The bass has four strings.
  de TS: Der Kontrabass hat vier Saiten.
  EN FS: The bass has six strings.
  de FS: Der Kontrabass hat sechs Saiten.
  EN TP: a bass with four strings
  de TP: ein Kontrabass mit vier Saiten
  EN FP: a bass with six strings
  de FP: ein Kontrabass mit sechs Saiten
1916 | ufo (noun): a flying object believed to come from space | loc: das UFO
  EN TS: There are UFOs in the sky.
  de TS: Am Himmel sind UFOs.
  EN FS: There are birds in the sky.
  de FS: Am Himmel sind Vögel.
  EN TP: UFOs in the sky
  de TP: UFOs am Himmel
  EN FP: a UFO landing
  de FP: ein UFO landet
1917 | speed (noun): how fast something moves, distance per time | loc: Geschwindigkeit
  EN TS: A helmet designed for speed.
  de TS: Ein Helm, gemacht für Geschwindigkeit.
  EN FS: A helmet designed for cycling.
  de FS: Ein Helm, gemacht fürs Radfahren.
  EN TP: a helmet built for speed
  de TP: ein Helm für hohe Geschwindigkeit
  EN FP: speed on a bicycle
  de FP: Geschwindigkeit auf dem Fahrrad
1919 | narrow (adjective): not wide, small from side to side | loc: schmal
  EN TS: The lane is very narrow.
  de TS: Die Gasse ist sehr schmal.
  EN FS: The lane is very wide.
  de FS: Die Gasse ist sehr breit.
  EN TP: a narrow cobblestone lane
  de TP: eine schmale Kopfsteingasse
  EN FP: a narrow escape
  de FP: ein knappes Entkommen
1920 | cyborg (noun): a being that is part human, part machine | loc: Cyborg
  EN TS: The cyborg has a glowing head.
  de TS: Der Cyborg hat einen leuchtenden Kopf.
  EN FS: The cyborg has a glowing tail.
  de FS: Der Cyborg hat einen leuchtenden Schwanz.
  EN TP: a neon city cyborg
  de TP: ein Cyborg in der Neonstadt
  EN FP: a cyborg in a forest
  de FP: ein Cyborg im Wald
1921 | shocked (adjective): very surprised and upset by something bad | loc: schockiert
  EN TS: A shocked face by the water.
  de TS: Ein schockiertes Gesicht am Wasser.
  EN FS: A shocked face in the forest.
  de FS: Ein schockiertes Gesicht im Wald.
  EN TP: a shocked, screaming face
  de TP: ein schockiertes, schreiendes Gesicht
  EN FP: shocked by the phone bill
  de FP: schockiert von der Handyrechnung
1922 | study (verb): to learn about a subject by reading | loc: lernen
  EN TS: Studying gives her a headache.
  de TS: Lernen macht ihr Kopfschmerzen.
  EN FS: Cooking gives her a headache.
  de FS: Kochen macht ihr Kopfschmerzen.
  EN TP: studying a huge book
  de TP: mit einem Riesenbuch lernen
  EN FP: studying in the garden
  de FP: im Garten lernen
1923 | bookshelf (noun): shelves where books stand side by side | loc: Bücherregal
  EN TS: The bookshelves are packed!
  de TS: Die Bücherregale sind rappelvoll!
  EN FS: The bookshelves are empty!
  de FS: Die Bücherregale sind leer!
  EN TP: tall bookshelves full of books
  de TP: hohe Bücherregale voller Bücher
  EN FP: an empty bookshelf
  de FP: ein leeres Bücherregal
1924 | vivid (adjective): very bright and intense in colour | loc: leuchtend
  EN TS: So many vivid colours!
  de TS: So viele leuchtende Farben!
  EN FS: So many dull colours!
  de FS: So viele matte Farben!
  EN TP: vivid swirls of colour
  de TP: leuchtende Farbwirbel
  EN FP: a vivid dream
  de FP: ein lebhafter Traum
1926 | teeth (noun): the hard white things in your mouth for biting | loc: Zähne
  EN TS: The skull has all its teeth!
  de TS: Der Schädel hat noch alle Zähne!
  EN FS: The skull has no teeth!
  de FS: Der Schädel hat keine Zähne!
  EN TP: a skull's grinning teeth
  de TP: die grinsenden Zähne eines Schädels
  EN FP: a dog's sharp teeth
  de FP: die spitzen Zähne eines Hundes
1927 | roots (noun): the parts of a plant that grow underground | loc: Wurzeln
  EN TS: Golden roots? Not a cheap tree.
  de TS: Goldene Wurzeln? Kein billiger Baum.
  EN FS: Golden leaves? Not a cheap tree.
  de FS: Goldene Blätter? Kein billiger Baum.
  EN TP: golden roots with jewels
  de TP: goldene Wurzeln mit Juwelen
  EN FP: golden leaves with jewels
  de FP: goldene Blätter mit Juwelen
1928 | downtown (noun): the busy central business area of a city | loc: Innenstadt
  EN TS: Downtown glows red. So cool.
  de TS: Die Innenstadt leuchtet rot. So cool.
  EN FS: Downtown glows green. So cool.
  de FS: Die Innenstadt leuchtet grün. So cool.
  EN TP: a neon downtown street
  de TP: eine Neonstraße in der Innenstadt
  EN FP: a quiet downtown morning
  de FP: ein ruhiger Morgen in der Innenstadt
1930 | medieval (adjective): from the age of castles and stone towns | loc: mittelalterlich
  EN TS: The medieval town looks cosy.
  de TS: Die mittelalterliche Stadt sieht gemütlich aus.
  EN FS: The modern city looks cosy.
  de FS: Die moderne Stadt sieht gemütlich aus.
  EN TP: a medieval stone town
  de TP: eine mittelalterliche Steinstadt
  EN FP: a medieval market day
  de FP: ein mittelalterlicher Markttag
1931 | rainy (adjective): with a lot of water falling from the clouds | loc: regnerisch
  EN TS: A rainy city street.
  de TS: Eine regnerische Straße in der Stadt.
  EN FS: A sunny city street.
  de FS: Eine sonnige Straße in der Stadt.
  EN TP: a rainy street
  de TP: eine regnerische Straße
  EN FP: a rainy beach
  de FP: ein regnerischer Strand
1932 | computer (noun): an electronic machine for work, games and the web | loc: Computer
  EN TS: The computer is on a red desk.
  de TS: Der Computer steht auf einem roten Schreibtisch.
  EN FS: The computer is on a red sofa.
  de FS: Der Computer steht auf einem roten Sofa.
  EN TP: a computer on a desk
  de TP: ein Computer auf dem Schreibtisch
  EN FP: a computer on a lap
  de FP: ein Computer auf dem Schoß
1933 | spirit (noun): a magical being of nature, not fully human | loc: Geist
  EN TS: She is a tree spirit.
  de TS: Sie ist ein Baumgeist.
  EN FS: She is a water spirit.
  de FS: Sie ist ein Wassergeist.
  EN TP: an old tree spirit
  de TP: ein alter Baumgeist
  EN FP: a spirit of the ocean
  de FP: ein Geist des Ozeans
1934 | surreal (adjective): strange and dream-like, against real rules | loc: surreal
  EN TS: These shelves are surreal.
  de TS: Diese Regale sind surreal.
  EN FS: These shelves are ordinary.
  de FS: Diese Regale sind ganz normal.
  EN TP: surreal bending bookshelves
  de TP: surreale, gebogene Bücherregale
  EN FP: a surreal melting clock
  de FP: eine surreale schmelzende Uhr
1935 | new york (noun): the biggest city in the United States | loc: New York
  EN TS: It is sunset in New York.
  de TS: In New York geht die Sonne unter.
  EN FS: It is night in New York.
  de FS: In New York ist es Nacht.
  EN TP: New York at sunset
  de TP: New York bei Sonnenuntergang
  EN FP: New York at night
  de FP: New York bei Nacht
1936 | flower crown (noun): a ring of blossoms you wear on your head | loc: Blumenkranz
  EN TS: Her flower crown is huge!
  de TS: Ihr Blumenkranz ist riesig!
  EN FS: Her feather crown is huge!
  de FS: Ihr Federkranz ist riesig!
  EN TP: wearing a flower crown
  de TP: einen Blumenkranz tragen
  EN FP: making a flower crown
  de FP: einen Blumenkranz binden
1937 | hacker (noun): a person who breaks into computers and code | loc: Hacker
  EN TS: The hacker is wearing a hood.
  de TS: Der Hacker trägt eine Kapuze.
  EN FS: The hacker is wearing a cap.
  de FS: Der Hacker trägt eine Kappe.
  EN TP: a hooded hacker
  de TP: ein Hacker mit Kapuze
  EN FP: a hacker in the park
  de FP: ein Hacker im Park
1938 | coast (noun): the land right along the edge of the sea | loc: Küste
  EN TS: A lone whale off the coast.
  de TS: Ein einsamer Wal vor der Küste.
  EN FS: A lone shark off the coast.
  de FS: Ein einsamer Hai vor der Küste.
  EN TP: a sandy coast from above
  de TP: eine Sandküste von oben
  EN FP: a rocky coast with cliffs
  de FP: eine Felsküste mit Klippen
1940 | dandelion (noun): a wild yellow flower that turns into a puffball | loc: Löwenzahn
  EN TS: Dandelions surround her head.
  de TS: Löwenzahn umgibt ihren Kopf.
  EN FS: Roses surround her head.
  de FS: Rosen umgeben ihren Kopf.
  EN TP: white dandelion puffs
  de TP: weißer Löwenzahnflaum
  EN FP: blowing a dandelion
  de FP: Löwenzahn pusten
1941 | pirate (noun): a sea robber who attacks ships | loc: Pirat
  EN TS: This pirate mouse looks like Jack Sparrow.
  de TS: Diese Piratenmaus sieht aus wie Jack Sparrow.
  EN FS: This pirate cat looks like Jack Sparrow.
  de FS: Diese Piratenkatze sieht aus wie Jack Sparrow.
  EN TP: a pirate mouse
  de TP: eine Piratenmaus
  EN FP: a pirate ship
  de FP: ein Piratenschiff
1943 | gnome (noun): a tiny fairy-tale creature in a pointed hat | loc: Gnom
  EN TS: The gnome's hat is green. Wow.
  de TS: Der Hut vom Gnom ist grün. Wow.
  EN FS: The gnome's hat is red. Wow.
  de FS: Der Hut vom Gnom ist rot. Wow.
  EN TP: a gnome in green
  de TP: ein Gnom in Grün
  EN FP: a gnome in red
  de FP: ein Gnom in Rot
1944 | ribs (noun): the curved bones around your chest | loc: Rippen
  EN TS: Fact: you can see its ribs.
  de TS: Fakt: Man sieht seine Rippen.
  EN FS: Fact: you can see its heart.
  de FS: Fakt: Man sieht sein Herz.
  EN TP: a cage of ribs
  de TP: ein Brustkorb aus Rippen
  EN FP: ribs on a grill
  de FP: Rippchen auf dem Grill
1945 | spooky (adjective): strange and frightening, like a ghost place | loc: gruselig
  EN TS: What a spooky castle!
  de TS: Was für ein gruseliges Schloss!
  EN FS: What a spooky church!
  de FS: Was für eine gruselige Kirche!
  EN TP: a spooky castle on rocks
  de TP: ein gruseliges Schloss auf Felsen
  EN FP: a spooky castle in snow
  de FP: ein gruseliges Schloss im Schnee
1946 | cool (adjective): stylish and relaxed in a way people admire | loc: cool
  EN TS: This cat is too cool.
  de TS: Diese Katze ist viel zu cool.
  EN FS: This dog is too cool.
  de FS: Dieser Hund ist viel zu cool.
  EN TP: a cool cat in sunglasses
  de TP: eine coole Katze mit Sonnenbrille
  EN FP: a cool summer drink
  de FP: ein cooles Sommergetränk
1947 | mane (noun): the long thick hair round a lion's neck | loc: Mähne
  EN TS: Just a normal rainbow mane.
  de TS: Nur eine ganz normale Regenbogenmähne.
  EN FS: Just a normal black mane.
  de FS: Nur eine ganz normale schwarze Mähne.
  EN TP: a rainbow mane
  de TP: eine Regenbogenmähne
  EN FP: a rainbow over a lion
  de FP: ein Regenbogen über einem Löwen
1948 | wavy (adjective): forming soft curves instead of lying straight | loc: wellig
  EN TS: Her wavy hair is everywhere!
  de TS: Ihr welliges Haar ist überall!
  EN FS: Her short hair is everywhere!
  de FS: Ihr kurzes Haar ist überall!
  EN TP: wavy hair full of leaves
  de TP: welliges Haar voller Blätter
  EN FP: wavy hair full of flowers
  de FP: welliges Haar voller Blumen
1949 | enchanted (adjective): under a magic spell | loc: verzaubert
  EN TS: This forest is so enchanted.
  de TS: Dieser Wald ist so verzaubert.
  EN FS: This forest is so burnt.
  de FS: Dieser Wald ist so verbrannt.
  EN TP: an enchanted forest path
  de TP: ein verzauberter Waldweg
  EN FP: an enchanted castle
  de FP: ein verzaubertes Schloss
1950 | evil (adjective): deeply bad and cruel | loc: böse
  EN TS: This evil tower needs a lift.
  de TS: Dieser böse Turm braucht einen Aufzug.
  EN FS: This evil church needs a lift.
  de FS: Diese böse Kirche braucht einen Aufzug.
  EN TP: an evil fortress
  de TP: eine böse Festung
  EN FP: an evil stepmother
  de FP: eine böse Stiefmutter
1951 | armchair (noun): a big soft chair with supports for your arms | loc: Sessel
  EN TS: An armchair awaits a reader.
  de TS: Ein Sessel wartet auf einen Leser.
  EN FS: A sofa awaits a reader.
  de FS: Ein Sofa wartet auf einen Leser.
  EN TP: a worn leather armchair
  de TP: ein abgewetzter Ledersessel
  EN FP: a new plastic armchair
  de FP: ein neuer Plastiksessel
1952 | full moon (noun): the whole bright round disc seen in the night sky | loc: Vollmond
  EN TS: A full moon behind one tree.
  de TS: Ein Vollmond hinter einem Baum.
  EN FS: A full moon behind two trees.
  de FS: Ein Vollmond hinter zwei Bäumen.
  EN TP: full moon behind a tree
  de TP: Vollmond hinter einem Baum
  EN FP: full moon over the sea
  de FP: Vollmond über dem Meer
1953 | snowflake (noun): a single small ice crystal that falls as snow | loc: Schneeflocke
  EN TS: Snowflake crown? Queen vibes.
  de TS: Krone aus Schneeflocken? Queen-Vibes.
  EN FS: Flower crown? Queen vibes.
  de FS: Krone aus Blumen? Queen-Vibes.
  EN TP: a crown of snowflakes
  de TP: eine Krone aus Schneeflocken
  EN FP: snowflakes on a window
  de FP: Schneeflocken am Fenster
1955 | fairy tale (noun): a magical story world with witches and elves | loc: Märchen
  EN TS: OMG, it's a fairy tale house.
  de TS: OMG, das ist ein Märchenhaus.
  EN FS: OMG, it's a fairy tale boat.
  de FS: OMG, das ist ein Märchenboot.
  EN TP: a fairy tale cottage
  de TP: ein Märchenhäuschen
  EN FP: a fairy tale castle
  de FP: ein Märchenschloss
1957 | cobblestones (noun): the round stones that pave old streets | loc: Kopfsteinpflaster
  EN TS: The cobblestones are wet.
  de TS: Das Kopfsteinpflaster ist nass.
  EN FS: The cobblestones are snowy.
  de FS: Das Kopfsteinpflaster ist verschneit.
  EN TP: wet cobblestones at night
  de TP: nasses Kopfsteinpflaster bei Nacht
  EN FP: cobblestones on a beach
  de FP: Kopfsteinpflaster am Strand
1958 | stairs (noun): a flight of steps | loc: Treppe
  EN TS: Stone stairs and pink flowers.
  de TS: Steintreppe und rosa Blumen.
  EN FS: Stone stairs and red flowers.
  de FS: Steintreppe und rote Blumen.
  EN TP: stone stairs in a village
  de TP: eine Steintreppe im Dorf
  EN FP: stone stairs in a castle
  de FP: eine Steintreppe in einer Burg
1959 | braid (noun): hair woven into one plaited strand | loc: Zopf
  EN TS: Her braid reaches her waist.
  de TS: Ihr Zopf reicht bis zur Taille.
  EN FS: Her braid reaches her knees.
  de FS: Ihr Zopf reicht bis zu den Knien.
  EN TP: a waist-long braid
  de TP: ein taillenlanger Zopf
  EN FP: a short braid
  de FP: ein kurzer Zopf
1960 | samurai (noun): a Japanese warrior who fights with a sword | loc: Samurai
  EN TS: She's walking like a real samurai.
  de TS: Sie läuft wie ein echter Samurai.
  EN FS: She's dancing like a real samurai.
  de FS: Sie tanzt wie ein echter Samurai.
  EN TP: a samurai with a sword
  de TP: ein Samurai mit Schwert
  EN FP: a samurai with a bow
  de FP: ein Samurai mit Bogen
1961 | bone (noun): the rigid tissue that makes up the skeleton | loc: Knochen
  EN TS: These bones love a good book.
  de TS: Diese Knochen lieben ein gutes Buch.
  EN FS: These bones love a good film.
  de FS: Diese Knochen lieben einen guten Film.
  EN TP: bones over an open book
  de TP: Knochen über einem offenen Buch
  EN FP: a dog with a bone
  de FP: ein Hund mit Knochen
1962 | fortress (noun): a large strong building made to defend | loc: Festung
  EN TS: This fortress looks scary!
  de TS: Diese Festung sieht gruselig aus!
  EN FS: This cottage looks scary!
  de FS: Dieses Häuschen sieht gruselig aus!
  EN TP: a dark hilltop fortress
  de TP: eine dunkle Festung auf dem Hügel
  EN FP: a fortress in the desert
  de FP: eine Festung in der Wüste
1964 | haunted (adjective): believed to have ghosts living inside | loc: von Geistern heimgesucht
  EN TS: The house must be haunted.
  de TS: Das Haus ist bestimmt von Geistern heimgesucht.
  EN FS: The school must be haunted.
  de FS: Die Schule ist bestimmt von Geistern heimgesucht.
  EN TP: a haunted old house
  de TP: ein altes Spukhaus
  EN FP: a haunted old ship
  de FP: ein altes Geisterschiff
1965 | cabin (noun): a small simple wooden house | loc: Hütte
  EN TS: Cosy cabin. A bit of snow.
  de TS: Gemütliche Hütte. Ein bisschen Schnee.
  EN FS: Cosy cabin. A bit of sand.
  de FS: Gemütliche Hütte. Ein bisschen Sand.
  EN TP: a snowy wooden cabin
  de TP: eine verschneite Holzhütte
  EN FP: a cabin on a ship
  de FP: eine Kajüte auf einem Schiff
1966 | path (noun): a narrow marked way that you walk along | loc: Pfad
  EN TS: The path is made of stones.
  de TS: Der Pfad ist aus Steinen.
  EN FS: The path is made of wood.
  de FS: Der Pfad ist aus Holz.
  EN TP: a cobblestone path
  de TP: ein Pfad aus Kopfsteinpflaster
  EN FP: a forest path
  de FP: ein Waldpfad
1967 | cute (adjective): small and sweet in a way that makes you smile | loc: süß
  EN TS: The baby fox is so cute!
  de TS: Der kleine Fuchs ist so süß!
  EN FS: The baby bear is so cute!
  de FS: Der kleine Bär ist so süß!
  EN TP: a cute baby fox
  de TP: ein süßes Fuchsbaby
  EN FP: a cute baby bird
  de FP: ein süßes Vogelbaby
1968 | raven (noun): a large black bird like a big crow | loc: Rabe
  EN TS: I think those are ravens.
  de TS: Ich glaube, das sind Raben.
  EN FS: I think those are parrots.
  de FS: Ich glaube, das sind Papageien.
  EN TP: ravens flying around her
  de TP: Raben fliegen um sie herum
  EN FP: ravens sitting on her arm
  de FP: Raben sitzen auf ihrem Arm
1969 | bouquet (noun): a bunch of flowers arranged together | loc: Blumenstrauß
  EN TS: A bouquet from space? Romantic!
  de TS: Ein Blumenstrauß aus dem All? Romantisch!
  EN FS: A bouquet from the sea? Romantic!
  de FS: Ein Blumenstrauß aus dem Meer? Romantisch!
  EN TP: gathering a bouquet
  de TP: einen Blumenstrauß pflücken
  EN FP: throwing a bouquet
  de FP: einen Blumenstrauß werfen
1970 | hut (noun): a small simple building | loc: Hütte
  EN TS: The hut has one plank door. Basic, but solid.
  de TS: Die Hütte hat eine Tür aus Brettern. Einfach, aber solide.
  EN FS: The hut has one glass door. Basic, but solid.
  de FS: Die Hütte hat eine Tür aus Glas. Einfach, aber solide.
  EN TP: a tiny snowy hut
  de TP: eine winzige verschneite Hütte
  EN FP: a tiny beach hut
  de FP: eine winzige Strandhütte
1971 | peak (noun): the pointed top of a mountain | loc: Gipfel
  EN TS: Peaks over clouds. Unreal.
  de TS: Gipfel über den Wolken. Krass.
  EN FS: Peaks under clouds. Unreal.
  de FS: Gipfel unter den Wolken. Krass.
  EN TP: snowy peaks above the clouds
  de TP: verschneite Gipfel über den Wolken
  EN FP: peaks covered in forest
  de FP: bewaldete Gipfel
1972 | turban (noun): a long cloth wound around the head | loc: der Turban
  EN TS: That turban is a whole tower!
  de TS: Dieser Turban ist ein ganzer Turm!
  EN FS: That crown is a whole tower!
  de FS: Diese Krone ist ein ganzer Turm!
  EN TP: a tall jeweled turban
  de TP: ein hoher Turban mit Juwelen
  EN FP: a turban in the desert
  de FP: ein Turban in der Wüste
1973 | goddess (noun): a female god | loc: Göttin
  EN TS: This goddess looks Egyptian.
  de TS: Diese Göttin sieht ägyptisch aus.
  EN FS: This goddess looks Japanese.
  de FS: Diese Göttin sieht japanisch aus.
  EN TP: a goddess with golden wings
  de TP: eine Göttin mit goldenen Flügeln
  EN FP: a goddess with a bow
  de FP: eine Göttin mit Bogen
1974 | ballerina (noun): a girl who dances ballet on her toes | loc: Ballerina
  EN TS: The ballerina is on her toes.
  de TS: Die Ballerina steht auf den Zehenspitzen.
  EN FS: The ballerina is on her knees.
  de FS: Die Ballerina hockt auf den Knien.
  EN TP: a ballerina in a tutu
  de TP: eine Ballerina im Tutu
  EN FP: a ballerina shoe
  de FP: ein Ballettschuh
1976 | skate (verb): to glide over ice wearing ice skates | loc: Schlittschuh laufen
  EN TS: Four kids are skating while squirrels judge them.
  de TS: Vier Kinder laufen Schlittschuh, und Eichhörnchen bewerten sie.
  EN FS: Four kids are skating while dogs judge them.
  de FS: Vier Kinder laufen Schlittschuh, und Hunde bewerten sie.
  EN TP: skating on a frozen pond
  de TP: auf dem Eisteich Schlittschuh laufen
  EN FP: skating on a half-pipe
  de FP: auf der Halfpipe skaten
1977 | creepy (adjective): making you feel nervous and a bit scared | loc: gruselig
  EN TS: The bats make it extra creepy!
  de TS: Die Fledermäuse machen es extra gruselig!
  EN FS: The owls make it extra creepy!
  de FS: Die Eulen machen es extra gruselig!
  EN TP: a creepy ruined house
  de TP: ein gruseliges verfallenes Haus
  EN FP: a creepy old doll
  de FP: eine gruselige alte Puppe
1979 | dye (verb): to change the colour of hair or cloth | loc: färben
  EN TS: She dyed it purple. Bold!
  de TS: Sie hat die Haare lila gefärbt. Mutig!
  EN FS: She dyed it green. Bold!
  de FS: Sie hat die Haare grün gefärbt. Mutig!
  EN TP: hair dyed bright purple
  de TP: knallig lila gefärbte Haare
  EN FP: hair dyed bright green
  de FP: knallig grün gefärbte Haare
1980 | pine (noun): a tall evergreen tree with needles | loc: Kiefer
  EN TS: Evergreen pines surround the hut.
  de TS: Immergrüne Kiefern umgeben die Hütte.
  EN FS: Evergreen palms surround the hut.
  de FS: Immergrüne Palmen umgeben die Hütte.
  EN TP: snowy pine trees
  de TP: verschneite Kiefern
  EN FP: a pine table
  de FP: ein Kieferntisch
1981 | crash (verb): to hit something hard with a loud noise | loc: krachen
  EN TS: Waves are crashing into the lighthouse!
  de TS: Wellen krachen gegen den Leuchtturm!
  EN FS: Waves are crashing into the harbour!
  de FS: Wellen krachen gegen den Hafen!
  EN TP: waves crashing on rocks
  de TP: Wellen krachen gegen Felsen
  EN FP: crashing on a friend's sofa
  de FP: beim Kumpel auf dem Sofa pennen
1982 | cluttered (adjective): untidily full of far too many things | loc: vollgestopft
  EN TS: The room is "a bit" cluttered.
  de TS: Das Zimmer ist „ein bisschen“ vollgestopft.
  EN FS: The room is "a bit" empty.
  de FS: Das Zimmer ist „ein bisschen“ leer.
  EN TP: cluttered shelves
  de TP: vollgestopfte Regale
  EN FP: a cluttered desk
  de FP: ein vollgestopfter Schreibtisch
1983 | eyelashes (noun): the small hairs on the edge of the eyelids | loc: Wimpern
  EN TS: Her eyelashes are very long.
  de TS: Ihre Wimpern sind sehr lang.
  EN FS: Her eyelashes are very short.
  de FS: Ihre Wimpern sind sehr kurz.
  EN TP: long dark eyelashes
  de TP: lange dunkle Wimpern
  EN FP: fake eyelashes in a box
  de FP: künstliche Wimpern in einer Schachtel
1984 | pale (adjective): very light, almost white in colour | loc: blass
  EN TS: Her face is very pale.
  de TS: Ihr Gesicht ist sehr blass.
  EN FS: Her face is very dark.
  de FS: Ihr Gesicht ist sehr dunkel.
  EN TP: a pale white face
  de TP: ein blasses weißes Gesicht
  EN FP: a pale blue sky
  de FP: ein blassblauer Himmel
1985 | bright (adjective): strong and full of color, easy to see | loc: leuchtend
  EN TS: The tree is bright red!
  de TS: Der Baum ist leuchtend rot!
  EN FS: The tree is bright green!
  de FS: Der Baum ist leuchtend grün!
  EN TP: bright red leaves
  de TP: leuchtend rote Blätter
  EN FP: bright red apples
  de FP: leuchtend rote Äpfel
1986 | bare (adjective): not covered — no leaves, no clothes | loc: kahl
  EN TS: The tree is bare. So sad.
  de TS: Der Baum ist kahl. So traurig.
  EN FS: The tree is green. So sad.
  de FS: Der Baum ist grün. So traurig.
  EN TP: a bare tree at night
  de TP: ein kahler Baum bei Nacht
  EN FP: bare feet in the grass
  de FP: nackte Füße im Gras
1987 | future (phrase): the time that will come after now | loc: Zukunft
  EN TS: This city is from the future.
  de TS: Diese Stadt kommt aus der Zukunft.
  EN FS: This city is from the past.
  de FS: Diese Stadt kommt aus der Vergangenheit.
  EN TP: a city of the future
  de TP: eine Stadt der Zukunft
  EN FP: a city of the past
  de FP: eine Stadt der Vergangenheit
1988 | fence (noun): a barrier that goes around an area | loc: Zaun
  EN TS: The fence has sharp spikes.
  de TS: Der Zaun hat spitze Stacheln.
  EN FS: The fence has no gate.
  de FS: Der Zaun hat kein Tor.
  EN TP: a spiked iron fence
  de TP: ein spitzer Eisenzaun
  EN FP: a wooden garden fence
  de FP: ein hölzerner Gartenzaun
1989 | potion (noun): a magic drink made for a special effect | loc: Zaubertrank
  EN TS: Old potions fill the shelves.
  de TS: Alte Zaubertränke füllen die Regale.
  EN FS: Old shoes fill the shelves.
  de FS: Alte Schuhe füllen die Regale.
  EN TP: shelves of old potions
  de TP: Regale voller alter Zaubertränke
  EN FP: a potion in a cauldron
  de FP: ein Zaubertrank im Kessel
1990 | comfortable (adjective): giving a feeling of physical well-being | loc: bequem
  EN TS: A super comfortable armchair.
  de TS: Ein mega bequemer Sessel.
  EN FS: A super comfortable sofa.
  de FS: Ein mega bequemes Sofa.
  EN TP: a comfortable golden armchair
  de TP: ein bequemer goldener Sessel
  EN FP: a comfortable golden bed
  de FP: ein bequemes goldenes Bett
1991 | type (verb): to write using a keyboard | loc: tippen
  EN TS: He is typing like a machine!
  de TS: Er tippt wie eine Maschine!
  EN FS: He is painting like a machine!
  de FS: Er malt wie eine Maschine!
  EN TP: typing on a keyboard
  de TP: auf einer Tastatur tippen
  EN FP: typing on a phone
  de FP: auf dem Handy tippen
1992 | listen (verb): to hear something on purpose | loc: hören
  EN TS: She is listening through big green headphones.
  de TS: Sie hört über große grüne Kopfhörer.
  EN FS: She is listening through big red headphones.
  de FS: Sie hört über große rote Kopfhörer.
  EN TP: listening to music
  de TP: Musik hören
  EN FP: listening to a teacher
  de FP: einer Lehrerin zuhören
1994 | on top of (preposition): resting on the highest part of something | loc: oben auf
  EN TS: A cat is on top of the books.
  de TS: Eine Katze liegt oben auf den Büchern.
  EN FS: A cat is on top of the hedge.
  de FS: Eine Katze liegt oben auf der Hecke.
  EN TP: on top of the books
  de TP: oben auf den Büchern
  EN FP: on top of the car
  de FP: oben auf dem Auto
1995 | doorway (noun): the opening in a wall where a door is | loc: Türöffnung
  EN TS: This doorway leads to another world.
  de TS: Diese Türöffnung führt in eine andere Welt.
  EN FS: This doorway leads to a dark cellar.
  de FS: Diese Türöffnung führt in einen dunklen Keller.
  EN TP: a glowing arched doorway
  de TP: eine leuchtende gewölbte Türöffnung
  EN FP: a doorway to the kitchen
  de FP: eine Türöffnung zur Küche
1997 | axe (noun): a tool with a heavy blade for chopping | loc: Axt
  EN TS: That battle axe is huge!
  de TS: Diese Streitaxt ist riesig!
  EN FS: That battle shield is huge!
  de FS: Dieser Kampfschild ist riesig!
  EN TP: holding a battle axe
  de TP: eine Streitaxt halten
  EN FP: holding a battle flag
  de FP: eine Kriegsfahne halten
1998 | mansion (noun): a very large and impressive house | loc: Villa
  EN TS: Rich people live in this mansion.
  de TS: In dieser Villa wohnen reiche Leute.
  EN FS: Rich people live in this cottage.
  de FS: In diesem Häuschen wohnen reiche Leute.
  EN TP: a mansion at dusk
  de TP: eine Villa in der Dämmerung
  EN FP: a mansion on the beach
  de FP: eine Villa am Strand
1999 | fur (noun): the soft thick hair covering an animal | loc: Fell
  EN TS: Bro, that fur is so thick.
  de TS: Bro, das Fell ist so dick.
  EN FS: Bro, that fur is so black.
  de FS: Bro, das Fell ist so schwarz.
  EN TP: thick white fur
  de TP: dickes weißes Fell
  EN FP: a white fur coat
  de FP: ein weißer Pelzmantel
2000 | moonlight (noun): the light the moon gives at night | loc: Mondlicht
  EN TS: Moonlight is shining on water.
  de TS: Mondlicht scheint aufs Wasser.
  EN FS: Sunlight is shining on water.
  de FS: Sonnenlicht scheint aufs Wasser.
  EN TP: moonlight on a marsh
  de TP: Mondlicht über einem Sumpf
  EN FP: moonlight in a bedroom
  de FP: Mondlicht im Schlafzimmer
2001 | beak (noun): the hard pointed mouth part of a bird | loc: Schnabel
  EN TS: The owl has a gold beak. Rich owl!
  de TS: Die Eule hat einen goldenen Schnabel. Reiche Eule!
  EN FS: The owl has a red beak. Rich owl!
  de FS: Die Eule hat einen roten Schnabel. Reiche Eule!
  EN TP: an owl's golden beak
  de TP: der goldene Schnabel einer Eule
  EN FP: an owl's broken beak
  de FP: der abgebrochene Schnabel einer Eule
2002 | whiskers (noun): the long stiff hairs on a cat's face | loc: Schnurrhaare
  EN TS: The cat has long whiskers.
  de TS: Die Katze hat lange Schnurrhaare.
  EN FS: The cat has short whiskers.
  de FS: Die Katze hat kurze Schnurrhaare.
  EN TP: a cat with long whiskers
  de TP: eine Katze mit langen Schnurrhaaren
  EN FP: a man with long whiskers
  de FP: ein Mann mit langem Schnurrbart
2005 | crow (noun): a big all-black bird with a harsh call | loc: Krähe
  EN TS: The crow is waiting for news.
  de TS: Die Krähe wartet auf Neuigkeiten.
  EN FS: The owl is waiting for news.
  de FS: Die Eule wartet auf Neuigkeiten.
  EN TP: a crow on a branch
  de TP: eine Krähe auf einem Ast
  EN FP: a crow on a scarecrow
  de FP: eine Krähe auf einer Vogelscheuche
2008 | trunk (noun): the thick wooden stem of a tree | loc: der Stamm
  EN TS: The trunk is huge and twisted.
  de TS: Der Stamm ist riesig und verdreht.
  EN FS: The trunk is thin and smooth.
  de FS: Der Stamm ist dünn und glatt.
  EN TP: a massive twisted trunk
  de TP: ein massiver, verdrehter Stamm
  EN FP: an elephant's trunk
  de FP: ein Elefantenrüssel
2010 | story (noun): a tale about people and events | loc: Geschichte
  EN TS: The story is coming alive!
  de TS: Die Geschichte wird lebendig!
  EN FS: The story is burning!
  de FS: Die Geschichte brennt!
  EN TP: a story coming alive
  de TP: eine Geschichte wird lebendig
  EN FP: a story about a city
  de FP: eine Geschichte über eine Stadt
2011 | open (adjective): not closed, so you can go or see through | loc: offen
  EN TS: The door is wide open.
  de TS: Die Tür ist weit offen.
  EN FS: The door is closed.
  de FS: Die Tür ist zu.
  EN TP: an open glass door
  de TP: eine offene Glastür
  EN FP: an open laptop
  de FP: ein offener Laptop
2012 | entrance (noun): something that gives you a way to get in | loc: Eingang
  EN TS: Flowers cover the entrance.
  de TS: Blumen bedecken den Eingang.
  EN FS: Snow covers the entrance.
  de FS: Schnee bedeckt den Eingang.
  EN TP: a garden entrance with flowers
  de TP: ein Garteneingang mit Blumen
  EN FP: a hotel entrance with flowers
  de FP: ein Hoteleingang mit Blumen
2013 | gothic (adjective): in a dark dramatic style with black clothes | loc: gotisch
  EN TS: Her makeup? Totally gothic.
  de TS: Ihr Make-up? Total gotisch.
  EN FS: Her makeup? Totally pink.
  de FS: Ihr Make-up? Total pink.
  EN TP: a gothic look
  de TP: ein gotischer Look
  EN FP: a gothic church
  de FP: eine gotische Kirche
2014 | dusk (noun): the fading light just before night | loc: Dämmerung
  EN TS: Alone at dusk. So mysterious.
  de TS: Allein in der Dämmerung. So geheimnisvoll.
  EN FS: Alone at noon. So mysterious.
  de FS: Allein am Mittag. So geheimnisvoll.
  EN TP: an old lane at dusk
  de TP: eine alte Gasse in der Dämmerung
  EN FP: dusk on an empty beach
  de FP: Dämmerung an einem leeren Strand
2015 | monument (noun): a big old structure built to be remembered | loc: Denkmal
  EN TS: Fact: the monument is stone.
  de TS: Fakt: Das Denkmal ist aus Stein.
  EN FS: Fact: the monument is wood.
  de FS: Fakt: Das Denkmal ist aus Holz.
  EN TP: an old stone monument
  de TP: ein altes Steindenkmal
  EN FP: a monument in a square
  de FP: ein Denkmal auf einem Platz
2016 | wand (noun): a thin stick used to cast magic spells | loc: der Zauberstab
  EN TS: Harry Potter needs this wand, bro.
  de TS: Harry Potter braucht diesen Zauberstab, Bro.
  EN FS: Harry Potter needs this broom, bro.
  de FS: Harry Potter braucht diesen Besen, Bro.
  EN TP: a glowing magic wand
  de TP: ein leuchtender Zauberstab
  EN FP: a broken magic wand
  de FP: ein kaputter Zauberstab
2019 | locomotive (noun): the engine at the front that pulls a train | loc: Lokomotive
  EN TS: The locomotive runs on steam.
  de TS: Die Lokomotive fährt mit Dampf.
  EN FS: The locomotive runs on diesel.
  de FS: Die Lokomotive fährt mit Diesel.
  EN TP: an old steam locomotive
  de TP: eine alte Dampflokomotive
  EN FP: an old diesel locomotive
  de FP: eine alte Diesellokomotive
2021 | constellation (noun): a group of stars that forms a pattern | loc: Sternbild
  EN TS: Constellations fill the sky.
  de TS: Sternbilder füllen den Himmel.
  EN FS: Rainbows fill the sky.
  de FS: Regenbögen füllen den Himmel.
  EN TP: constellations above the house
  de TP: Sternbilder über dem Haus
  EN FP: constellations on a map
  de FP: Sternbilder auf einer Karte
2023 | gift (noun): something you are given for free | loc: Geschenk
  EN TS: Gifts were left in the snow!
  de TS: Da liegen Geschenke im Schnee!
  EN FS: Skis were left in the snow!
  de FS: Da liegen Skier im Schnee!
  EN TP: gift boxes in the snow
  de TP: Geschenkboxen im Schnee
  EN FP: gift boxes under a bed
  de FP: Geschenkboxen unterm Bett
2024 | neon (adjective): glowing in bright electric colours | loc: neonfarben
  EN TS: Neon signs everywhere!
  de TS: Überall neonfarbene Schilder!
  EN FS: Paper signs everywhere!
  de FS: Überall Papierschilder!
  EN TP: pink and green neon signs
  de TP: rosa und grüne Neonschilder
  EN FP: a neon green jacket
  de FP: eine neongrüne Jacke
2025 | futuristic (adjective): looking modern, high-tech and from the future | loc: futuristisch
  EN TS: Futuristic city, year 3000?
  de TS: Futuristische Stadt, Jahr 3000?
  EN FS: Futuristic village, year 3000?
  de FS: Futuristisches Dorf, Jahr 3000?
  EN TP: futuristic towers at night
  de TP: futuristische Türme bei Nacht
  EN FP: a futuristic flying car
  de FP: ein futuristisches fliegendes Auto
2026 | study (noun): a room at home used for reading and working | loc: Arbeitszimmer
  EN TS: What a dreamy study!
  de TS: Was für ein Traum-Arbeitszimmer!
  EN FS: What a dreamy kitchen!
  de FS: Was für eine Traumküche!
  EN TP: a study full of flowers
  de TP: ein Arbeitszimmer voller Blumen
  EN FP: a study full of students
  de FP: ein Arbeitszimmer voller Studenten
2028 | jug (noun): a container with a handle for holding liquid | loc: Krug
  EN TS: A white jug sits among books.
  de TS: Ein weißer Krug steht zwischen Büchern.
  EN FS: A white cat sits among books.
  de FS: Eine weiße Katze sitzt zwischen Büchern.
  EN TP: a jug on a bookshelf
  de TP: ein Krug im Bücherregal
  EN FP: a jug on a table
  de FP: ein Krug auf dem Tisch
2029 | trail (noun): a rough path through the countryside | loc: Pfad
  EN TS: The trail vanishes in the fog.
  de TS: Der Pfad verschwindet im Nebel.
  EN FS: The trail vanishes in the sea.
  de FS: Der Pfad verschwindet im Meer.
  EN TP: a stony mountain trail
  de TP: ein steiniger Bergpfad
  EN FP: a trail of footprints
  de FP: eine Spur aus Fußabdrücken
2031 | twig (noun): a very small thin branch of a tree | loc: der Zweig
  EN TS: Her hair has twigs. Weird.
  de TS: Sie hat Zweige in den Haaren. Komisch.
  EN FS: Her hair has flowers. Weird.
  de FS: Sie hat Blumen in den Haaren. Komisch.
  EN TP: twigs in her hair
  de TP: Zweige in ihren Haaren
  EN FP: a nest of twigs
  de FP: ein Nest aus Zweigen
2032 | portal (noun): a gateway that leads into another world | loc: Portal
  EN TS: A portal to a golden city.
  de TS: Ein Portal zu einer goldenen Stadt.
  EN FS: A portal to a dark forest.
  de FS: Ein Portal zu einem dunklen Wald.
  EN TP: a glowing round portal
  de TP: ein leuchtendes rundes Portal
  EN FP: a portal under the sea
  de FP: ein Portal unter dem Meer
2033 | whirlpool (noun): water that spins round and pulls things down | loc: der Strudel
  EN TS: The guitar is in a whirlpool!
  de TS: Die Gitarre steckt in einem Strudel!
  EN FS: The guitar is in a desert!
  de FS: Die Gitarre steckt in einer Wüste!
  EN TP: a guitar in a whirlpool
  de TP: eine Gitarre im Strudel
  EN FP: a boat in a whirlpool
  de FP: ein Boot im Strudel
2034 | poppy (noun): a wild flower with thin red petals | loc: Mohnblume
  EN TS: This poppy is red. Very red.
  de TS: Diese Mohnblume ist rot. Sehr rot.
  EN FS: This poppy is blue. Very blue.
  de FS: Diese Mohnblume ist blau. Sehr blau.
  EN TP: a red poppy bloom
  de TP: eine blühende rote Mohnblume
  EN FP: a field of poppies
  de FP: ein Feld voller Mohnblumen
2035 | romance (noun): a loving relationship between two people | loc: Romanze
  EN TS: This romance has a pink heart.
  de TS: Diese Romanze hat ein rosa Herz.
  EN FS: This romance has a red heart.
  de FS: Diese Romanze hat ein rotes Herz.
  EN TP: a romance in spring
  de TP: eine Romanze im Frühling
  EN FP: a romance novel
  de FP: ein Liebesroman
2036 | spear (noun): a long pole weapon with a sharp tip | loc: Speer
  EN TS: Spear supply is clearly not a problem.
  de TS: An Speeren herrscht hier eindeutig kein Mangel.
  EN FS: Sword supply is clearly not a problem.
  de FS: An Schwertern herrscht hier eindeutig kein Mangel.
  EN TP: an army raising spears
  de TP: ein Heer hebt die Speere
  EN FP: an army throwing spears
  de FP: ein Heer wirft Speere
2037 | creature (noun): a living being, especially a strange one | loc: Kreatur
  EN TS: A creature with dark wings.
  de TS: Eine Kreatur mit dunklen Flügeln.
  EN FS: A creature with long horns.
  de FS: Eine Kreatur mit langen Hörnern.
  EN TP: a dark winged creature
  de TP: eine dunkle geflügelte Kreatur
  EN FP: a creature in the sea
  de FP: eine Kreatur im Meer
2038 | afraid (adjective): filled with fear | loc: ängstlich
  EN TS: She is afraid, and the birds know it.
  de TS: Sie ist ängstlich, und die Vögel wissen das.
  EN FS: She is afraid, and the wolves know it.
  de FS: Sie ist ängstlich, und die Wölfe wissen das.
  EN TP: afraid in a dark forest
  de TP: ängstlich im dunklen Wald
  EN FP: afraid of a big dog
  de FP: Angst vor einem großen Hund
2040 | decoration (noun): a pretty thing that makes a place look festive | loc: Dekoration
  EN TS: Decorations are on every roof.
  de TS: Auf jedem Dach ist Dekoration.
  EN FS: Snowmen are on every roof.
  de FS: Auf jedem Dach sind Schneemänner.
  EN TP: decorations on the roofs
  de TP: Dekoration auf den Dächern
  EN FP: decorations in a box
  de FP: Dekoration in einer Kiste
2041 | bottle (noun): a plastic or glass container for liquids | loc: Flasche
  EN TS: A whole sunset lives in this bottle.
  de TS: In dieser Flasche wohnt ein ganzer Sonnenuntergang.
  EN FS: A whole ocean lives in this bottle.
  de FS: In dieser Flasche wohnt ein ganzer Ozean.
  EN TP: a dark glass bottle
  de TP: eine dunkle Glasflasche
  EN FP: a bottle of red wine
  de FP: eine Flasche Rotwein
2042 | huge (adjective): unusually great in size | loc: riesig
  EN TS: That moon is huge!
  de TS: Der Mond ist riesig!
  EN FS: That sun is huge!
  de FS: Die Sonne ist riesig!
  EN TP: a huge full moon
  de TP: ein riesiger Vollmond
  EN FP: a huge old castle
  de FP: eine riesige alte Burg
2045 | tall (adjective): great in height, from the ground up | loc: hoch
  EN TS: These stones are super tall.
  de TS: Diese Steine sind mega hoch.
  EN FS: These trees are super tall.
  de FS: Diese Bäume sind mega hoch.
  EN TP: tall standing stones
  de TP: hohe aufrechte Steine
  EN FP: tall trees in a field
  de FP: hohe Bäume auf einem Feld
2046 | snowy (adjective): covered with snow or full of falling snow | loc: verschneit
  EN TS: A snowy night in the forest. So quiet...
  de TS: Eine verschneite Nacht im Wald. So still...
  EN FS: A snowy night in the city. So quiet...
  de FS: Eine verschneite Nacht in der Stadt. So still...
  EN TP: a snowy forest at night
  de TP: ein verschneiter Wald bei Nacht
  EN FP: a snowy street at night
  de FP: eine verschneite Straße bei Nacht
2048 | wild (adjective): living in nature, not kept by people | loc: wild
  EN TS: This wolf is wild!
  de TS: Dieser Wolf ist wild!
  EN FS: This dog is wild!
  de FS: Dieser Hund ist wild!
  EN TP: a wild wolf
  de TP: ein wilder Wolf
  EN FP: a wild party
  de FP: eine wilde Party
2049 | cozy (adjective): warm, comfortable and inviting | loc: gemütlich
  EN TS: The reading corner looks cozy.
  de TS: Die Leseecke sieht gemütlich aus.
  EN FS: The kitchen corner looks cozy.
  de FS: Die Küchenecke sieht gemütlich aus.
  EN TP: a cozy reading corner
  de TP: eine gemütliche Leseecke
  EN FP: a cozy wool jumper
  de FP: ein gemütlicher Wollpulli
2052 | mug (noun): a big cup with a handle for hot drinks | loc: Becher
  EN TS: The mug is on a pile of books.
  de TS: Der Becher steht auf einem Bücherstapel.
  EN FS: The mug is on a pile of boxes.
  de FS: Der Becher steht auf einem Kistenstapel.
  EN TP: a silver mug on books
  de TP: ein silberner Becher auf Büchern
  EN FP: a mug of cold milk
  de FP: ein Becher kalte Milch
2053 | shelf (noun): a flat horizontal surface for holding objects | loc: Regal
  EN TS: Bottles fill every shelf.
  de TS: Flaschen füllen jedes Regal.
  EN FS: Books fill every shelf.
  de FS: Bücher füllen jedes Regal.
  EN TP: shelves of old bottles
  de TP: Regale voller alter Flaschen
  EN FP: shelves of old books
  de FP: Regale voller alter Bücher
2055 | poison (noun): something that harms you if you drink it | loc: Gift
  EN TS: The "Rejuvenation" is poison.
  de TS: Die „Verjüngungskur“ ist Gift.
  EN FS: The "Rejuvenation" is juice.
  de FS: Die „Verjüngungskur“ ist Saft.
  EN TP: a bottle of poison
  de TP: eine Flasche Gift
  EN FP: a bottle of wine
  de FP: eine Flasche Wein
2056 | full (adjective): containing as much as is possible | loc: voll
  EN TS: The shelves are full of books.
  de TS: Die Regale sind voller Bücher.
  EN FS: The shelves are full of jars.
  de FS: Die Regale sind voller Gläser.
  EN TP: shelves full of old books
  de TP: Regale voller alter Bücher
  EN FP: shelves full of old toys
  de FP: Regale voller alter Spielsachen
2057 | chimney (noun): a pipe on a roof that lets smoke out | loc: Schornstein
  EN TS: The chimney is made of stone.
  de TS: Der Schornstein ist aus Stein.
  EN FS: The chimney is made of metal.
  de FS: Der Schornstein ist aus Metall.
  EN TP: a stone chimney in snow
  de TP: ein Steinschornstein im Schnee
  EN FP: cleaning the chimney
  de FP: den Schornstein fegen
2058 | reach (verb): to move your arm forward to touch something | loc: greifen
  EN TS: A bear is reaching for a star.
  de TS: Ein Bär greift nach einem Stern.
  EN FS: A bear is reaching for a bird.
  de FS: Ein Bär greift nach einem Vogel.
  EN TP: reaching for a star
  de TP: nach einem Stern greifen
  EN FP: reaching for the honey
  de FP: nach dem Honig greifen
2059 | sunlight (noun): the light that comes from the sun | loc: Sonnenlicht
  EN TS: Sunlight hits one side only.
  de TS: Sonnenlicht trifft nur eine Seite.
  EN FS: Moonlight hits one side only.
  de FS: Mondlicht trifft nur eine Seite.
  EN TP: branches in bright sunlight
  de TP: Äste im hellen Sonnenlicht
  EN FP: sunlight on the water
  de FP: Sonnenlicht auf dem Wasser
2060 | skis (noun): a pair of long narrow boards for moving on snow | loc: Ski
  EN TS: Red and yellow skis, so cool.
  de TS: Rote und gelbe Ski, so cool.
  EN FS: Blue and white skis, so cool.
  de FS: Blaue und weiße Ski, so cool.
  EN TP: skis standing in the snow
  de TP: Ski stecken im Schnee
  EN FP: skis on a car roof
  de FP: Ski auf dem Autodach
2061 | galaxy (noun): a huge group of stars and glowing dust | loc: Galaxie
  EN TS: The galaxy is showing off.
  de TS: Die Galaxie gibt voll an.
  EN FS: The moon is showing off.
  de FS: Der Mond gibt voll an.
  EN TP: a glowing purple galaxy
  de TP: eine leuchtend lila Galaxie
  EN FP: a galaxy on a T-shirt
  de FP: eine Galaxie auf einem T-Shirt
2062 | balance (verb): to keep something steady so it does not fall | loc: balancieren
  EN TS: Someone balanced these stones.
  de TS: Jemand hat diese Steine aufeinander balanciert.
  EN FS: Someone balanced these cups.
  de FS: Jemand hat diese Tassen aufeinander balanciert.
  EN TP: stones balanced in a tower
  de TP: zu einem Turm balancierte Steine
  EN FP: to balance on one leg
  de FP: auf einem Bein balancieren
2064 | snow globe (noun): a glass ball with a tiny scene and snow inside | loc: Schneekugel
  EN TS: The snow globe has a church.
  de TS: In der Schneekugel ist eine Kirche.
  EN FS: The snow globe has a castle.
  de FS: In der Schneekugel ist eine Burg.
  EN TP: a glowing snow globe
  de TP: eine leuchtende Schneekugel
  EN FP: a broken snow globe
  de FP: eine zerbrochene Schneekugel
2067 | lamppost (noun): a tall street pole with a light on top | loc: Laternenpfahl
  EN TS: One lamppost, lots of snow.
  de TS: Ein Laternenpfahl, jede Menge Schnee.
  EN FS: One lamppost, lots of rain.
  de FS: Ein Laternenpfahl, jede Menge Regen.
  EN TP: a glowing lamppost
  de TP: ein leuchtender Laternenpfahl
  EN FP: a dog by a lamppost
  de FP: ein Hund am Laternenpfahl
2068 | door (noun): the opening in a wall you enter or leave through | loc: Tür
  EN TS: The red door is open.
  de TS: Die rote Tür ist offen.
  EN FS: The blue door is open.
  de FS: Die blaue Tür ist offen.
  EN TP: an open red door
  de TP: eine offene rote Tür
  EN FP: a red garage door
  de FP: ein rotes Garagentor
2069 | reindeer (noun): a large deer with antlers from the cold north | loc: Rentier
  EN TS: The reindeer had a bad flight.
  de TS: Das Rentier hatte einen miesen Flug.
  EN FS: The reindeer had a fun flight.
  de FS: Das Rentier hatte einen lustigen Flug.
  EN TP: reindeer stuck on a turbine
  de TP: Rentier steckt im Windrad fest
  EN FP: reindeer pulling a sleigh
  de FP: Rentiere ziehen einen Schlitten
2070 | electric guitar (noun): a guitar that needs an amplifier to be heard | loc: E-Gitarre
  EN TS: The electric guitar is a rocket!
  de TS: Die E-Gitarre ist eine Rakete!
  EN FS: The electric guitar is sinking!
  de FS: Die E-Gitarre geht unter!
  EN TP: an electric guitar taking off
  de TP: eine E-Gitarre hebt ab
  EN FP: an electric guitar on stage
  de FP: eine E-Gitarre auf der Bühne
2071 | vintage (adjective): old but classic and high quality | loc: im Vintage-Stil
  EN TS: Nice vintage car, so festive.
  de TS: Schönes Auto im Vintage-Stil, so festlich.
  EN FS: Nice vintage van, so festive.
  de FS: Schöner Bulli im Vintage-Stil, so festlich.
  EN TP: a vintage red car
  de TP: ein rotes Auto im Vintage-Stil
  EN FP: a vintage red dress
  de FP: ein rotes Kleid im Vintage-Stil
2072 | cable (noun): a thick wire that carries power or data | loc: Kabel
  EN TS: Cables cover the whole room!
  de TS: Kabel bedecken den ganzen Raum!
  EN FS: Plants cover the whole room!
  de FS: Pflanzen bedecken den ganzen Raum!
  EN TP: glowing blue cables
  de TP: blau leuchtende Kabel
  EN FP: cables on a bridge
  de FP: Kabel an einer Brücke
2073 | shine (verb): to be bright by casting or reflecting light | loc: scheinen
  EN TS: Look, the sun is shining in!
  de TS: Schau, die Sonne scheint herein!
  EN FS: Look, the moon is shining in!
  de FS: Schau, der Mond scheint herein!
  EN TP: sunlight shining in
  de TP: Sonnenlicht scheint herein
  EN FP: moonlight shining in
  de FP: Mondlicht scheint herein
2075 | windowsill (noun): the flat shelf at the bottom of a window | loc: die Fensterbank
  EN TS: Books sit on the windowsill.
  de TS: Bücher liegen auf der Fensterbank.
  EN FS: Cats sit on the windowsill.
  de FS: Katzen liegen auf der Fensterbank.
  EN TP: books on a windowsill
  de TP: Bücher auf einer Fensterbank
  EN FP: plants on a windowsill
  de FP: Pflanzen auf einer Fensterbank
2076 | literature (noun): written works such as novels, poems and stories | loc: Literatur
  EN TS: So much literature, so little time.
  de TS: So viel Literatur, so wenig Zeit.
  EN FS: So many pizzas, so little time.
  de FS: So viel Pizza, so wenig Zeit.
  EN TP: shelves of old literature
  de TP: Regale voller alter Literatur
  EN FP: literature on a phone
  de FP: Literatur auf dem Handy
2077 | stare (verb): to look at something for a long time | loc: starren
  EN TS: The owl is staring at me!
  de TS: Die Eule starrt mich an!
  EN FS: The cat is staring at me!
  de FS: Die Katze starrt mich an!
  EN TP: staring at the viewer
  de TP: den Betrachter anstarren
  EN FP: staring at the moon
  de FP: den Mond anstarren
2078 | flame (noun): the bright burning part of a fire or candle | loc: Flamme
  EN TS: Two flames light the book.
  de TS: Zwei Flammen beleuchten das Buch.
  EN FS: Three flames light the book.
  de FS: Drei Flammen beleuchten das Buch.
  EN TP: two candle flames
  de TP: zwei Kerzenflammen
  EN FP: flames in a fireplace
  de FP: Flammen im Kamin
2079 | wooden (adjective): made of wood | loc: hölzern
  EN TS: Everything here is wooden.
  de TS: Alles hier ist hölzern.
  EN FS: Everything here is plastic.
  de FS: Alles hier ist aus Plastik.
  EN TP: tall wooden bookcases
  de TP: hohe hölzerne Bücherregale
  EN FP: tall wooden ladders
  de FP: hohe hölzerne Leitern
2080 | pagoda (noun): an Asian temple with tiered curved roofs | loc: Pagode
  EN TS: Snow is falling on the pagoda.
  de TS: Schnee fällt auf die Pagode.
  EN FS: Rain is falling on the pagoda.
  de FS: Regen fällt auf die Pagode.
  EN TP: a red pagoda in snow
  de TP: eine rote Pagode im Schnee
  EN FP: a pagoda in the jungle
  de FP: eine Pagode im Dschungel
2081 | stepping stones (noun): flat stones you step on to cross water | loc: Trittsteine
  EN TS: Stepping stones cross a lake.
  de TS: Trittsteine führen über einen See.
  EN FS: Stepping stones cross a road.
  de FS: Trittsteine führen über eine Straße.
  EN TP: stepping stones across water
  de TP: Trittsteine übers Wasser
  EN FP: stepping stones in a garden
  de FP: Trittsteine im Garten
2082 | cane (noun): a thin stick you lean on while walking | loc: Spazierstock
  EN TS: He is holding a thin cane.
  de TS: Er hält einen dünnen Spazierstock.
  EN FS: He is holding a thin pipe.
  de FS: Er hält eine dünne Pfeife.
  EN TP: holding a walking cane
  de TP: einen Spazierstock halten
  EN FP: a cane in the snow
  de FP: ein Spazierstock im Schnee
2084 | railway (noun): the line that runs trains for passengers | loc: Eisenbahn
  EN TS: A train on a wet railway.
  de TS: Ein Zug auf einer nassen Eisenbahnstrecke.
  EN FS: A train on a dry railway.
  de FS: Ein Zug auf einer trockenen Eisenbahnstrecke.
  EN TP: a railway at night
  de TP: eine Eisenbahn bei Nacht
  EN FP: a railway in the desert
  de FP: eine Eisenbahn in der Wüste
2086 | festive (adjective): cheerful and decorated for a celebration | loc: festlich
  EN TS: The street looks so festive!
  de TS: Die Straße sieht so festlich aus!
  EN FS: The street looks so sunny!
  de FS: Die Straße sieht so sonnig aus!
  EN TP: a festive snowy street
  de TP: eine festliche verschneite Straße
  EN FP: a festive dinner table
  de FP: ein festlicher Esstisch
2087 | skyline (noun): the outline of a city against the sky | loc: Skyline
  EN TS: A foggy steampunk skyline.
  de TS: Eine neblige Steampunk-Skyline.
  EN FS: A foggy desert skyline.
  de FS: Eine neblige Wüsten-Skyline.
  EN TP: a skyline in the fog
  de TP: eine Skyline im Nebel
  EN FP: a skyline at midnight
  de FP: eine Skyline um Mitternacht
2088 | handsome (adjective): good-looking, used about a man | loc: gutaussehend
  EN TS: The handsome man has a beard.
  de TS: Der gutaussehende Mann hat einen Bart.
  EN FS: The handsome man has glasses.
  de FS: Der gutaussehende Mann hat eine Brille.
  EN TP: a handsome bearded man
  de TP: ein gutaussehender Mann mit Bart
  EN FP: a handsome man with glasses
  de FP: ein gutaussehender Mann mit Brille
2089 | antlers (noun): the branching horns on a deer's head | loc: Geweih
  EN TS: Man, those antlers are huge.
  de TS: Alter, dieses Geweih ist riesig.
  EN FS: Man, those antlers are tiny.
  de FS: Alter, dieses Geweih ist winzig.
  EN TP: huge branching antlers
  de TP: ein riesiges verzweigtes Geweih
  EN FP: antlers on the wall
  de FP: ein Geweih an der Wand
2091 | pine tree (noun): a tall tree with needles and cones | loc: Kiefer
  EN TS: The pine tree stands alone.
  de TS: Die Kiefer steht ganz allein.
  EN FS: The palm tree stands alone.
  de FS: Die Palme steht ganz allein.
  EN TP: a frosty pine tree
  de TP: eine frostige Kiefer
  EN FP: a pine tree with lights
  de FP: eine Kiefer mit Lichterkette
2092 | fluffy (adjective): soft and light, like fur or feathers | loc: flauschig
  EN TS: What a fluffy owl!
  de TS: Was für eine flauschige Eule!
  EN FS: What a fluffy cat!
  de FS: Was für eine flauschige Katze!
  EN TP: a fluffy blue owl
  de TP: eine flauschige blaue Eule
  EN FP: a fluffy blue blanket
  de FP: eine flauschige blaue Decke
2093 | green (adjective): the color between blue and yellow | loc: grün
  EN TS: The whole city is green.
  de TS: Die ganze Stadt ist grün.
  EN FS: The whole city is grey.
  de FS: Die ganze Stadt ist grau.
  EN TP: green towers full of trees
  de TP: grüne Türme voller Bäume
  EN FP: green paint on the towers
  de FP: grüne Farbe an den Türmen
2095 | long (adjective): measuring a lot from one end to the other | loc: lang
  EN TS: Her long hair is teal.
  de TS: Ihr langes Haar ist türkis.
  EN FS: Her long hair is black.
  de FS: Ihr langes Haar ist schwarz.
  EN TP: long flowing teal hair
  de TP: langes, wallendes türkises Haar
  EN FP: a long walk
  de FP: ein langer Spaziergang
2096 | red (adjective): the color at the end of the spectrum | loc: rot
  EN TS: Even the sky is red!
  de TS: Sogar der Himmel ist rot!
  EN FS: Even the sky is green!
  de FS: Sogar der Himmel ist grün!
  EN TP: a red desert sky
  de TP: ein roter Wüstenhimmel
  EN FP: a red sports car
  de FP: ein roter Sportwagen
2097 | ear (noun): the part of your head you hear with | loc: Ohr
  EN TS: Those ears are bigger than its head!
  de TS: Die Ohren sind größer als sein Kopf!
  EN FS: Those eyes are bigger than its head!
  de FS: Die Augen sind größer als sein Kopf!
  EN TP: enormous round ears
  de TP: riesige runde Ohren
  EN FP: ears under a hat
  de FP: Ohren unter einer Mütze
2099 | tree house (noun): a small hut built high up among branches | loc: Baumhaus
  EN TS: This tree house is so cool!
  de TS: Dieses Baumhaus ist so cool!
  EN FS: This dog house is so cool!
  de FS: Diese Hundehütte ist so cool!
  EN TP: a jungle tree house
  de TP: ein Baumhaus im Dschungel
  EN FP: a garden tree house
  de FP: ein Baumhaus im Garten
2100 | gown (noun): a long formal dress worn to a ball | loc: Ballkleid
  EN TS: Her gown is bigger than the garden!
  de TS: Ihr Ballkleid ist größer als der Garten!
  EN FS: Her hat is bigger than the garden!
  de FS: Ihr Hut ist größer als der Garten!
  EN TP: a huge blue ball gown
  de TP: ein riesiges blaues Ballkleid
  EN FP: a gown on a hanger
  de FP: ein Ballkleid auf dem Bügel
2101 | together (adverb): with each other, close or touching | loc: zusammen
  EN TS: They are walking together.
  de TS: Sie spazieren zusammen.
  EN FS: They are running together.
  de FS: Sie rennen zusammen.
  EN TP: walking close together
  de TP: eng zusammen spazieren
  EN FP: sitting together in a cafe
  de FP: zusammen im Café sitzen
2102 | collection (noun): a large group of similar things kept together | loc: Sammlung
  EN TS: What a book collection!
  de TS: Was für eine Büchersammlung!
  EN FS: What a shoe collection!
  de FS: Was für eine Schuhsammlung!
  EN TP: a collection of old books
  de TP: eine Sammlung alter Bücher
  EN FP: a collection of old coins
  de FP: eine Sammlung alter Münzen
2104 | jewelry (noun): necklaces, earrings and rings that you wear | loc: Schmuck
  EN TS: So much gold jewelry!
  de TS: So viel Goldschmuck!
  EN FS: So much silver jewelry!
  de FS: So viel Silberschmuck!
  EN TP: covered in gold jewelry
  de TP: voller Goldschmuck
  EN FP: selling gold jewelry
  de FP: Goldschmuck verkaufen
2105 | pile (noun): a heap of things placed on top of each other | loc: Stapel
  EN TS: The piles of books might fall.
  de TS: Die Bücherstapel könnten umfallen.
  EN FS: The piles of cups might fall.
  de FS: Die Tassenstapel könnten umfallen.
  EN TP: leaning piles of books
  de TP: schiefe Bücherstapel
  EN FP: a pile of clothes
  de FP: ein Stapel Klamotten
2107 | spaceship (noun): a large vehicle that travels through space | loc: Raumschiff
  EN TS: Where is everyone on this spaceship?
  de TS: Wo sind alle in diesem Raumschiff?
  EN FS: Where is everyone on this train?
  de FS: Wo sind alle in diesem Zug?
  EN TP: inside a spaceship
  de TP: in einem Raumschiff
  EN FP: a spaceship landing
  de FP: ein Raumschiff landet
2108 | pipe (noun): a tube that carries water or gas | loc: Rohr
  EN TS: Pipes run along the ceiling.
  de TS: Rohre verlaufen an der Decke.
  EN FS: Wires run along the ceiling.
  de FS: Kabel verlaufen an der Decke.
  EN TP: pipes along the ceiling
  de TP: Rohre an der Decke
  EN FP: pipes under the floor
  de FP: Rohre unter dem Boden
2109 | tidy (adjective): arranged neatly and in good order | loc: ordentlich
  EN TS: The books stand in tidy rows.
  de TS: Die Bücher stehen in ordentlichen Reihen.
  EN FS: The cups stand in tidy rows.
  de FS: Die Tassen stehen in ordentlichen Reihen.
  EN TP: tidy rows of books
  de TP: ordentliche Bücherreihen
  EN FP: a tidy desk
  de FP: ein ordentlicher Schreibtisch
2110 | silhouette (noun): a dark outline against a bright background | loc: Silhouette
  EN TS: Dark silhouette, neon city. Batman?
  de TS: Dunkle Silhouette, Neonstadt. Batman?
  EN FS: Dark silhouette, sunny beach. Batman?
  de FS: Dunkle Silhouette, Sonnenstrand. Batman?
  EN TP: a silhouette in a coat
  de TP: eine Silhouette im Mantel
  EN FP: a silhouette of a cat
  de FP: die Silhouette einer Katze
2112 | blazer (noun): a smart formal jacket worn over a shirt | loc: Blazer
  EN TS: Her blazer is bright yellow.
  de TS: Ihr Blazer ist knallgelb.
  EN FS: Her blazer is dark green.
  de FS: Ihr Blazer ist dunkelgrün.
  EN TP: a bright yellow blazer
  de TP: ein knallgelber Blazer
  EN FP: taking off a blazer
  de FP: einen Blazer ausziehen
2113 | yellow (adjective): the color between green and orange | loc: gelb
  EN TS: The flowers are bright yellow.
  de TS: Die Blumen sind leuchtend gelb.
  EN FS: The flowers are bright purple.
  de FS: Die Blumen sind leuchtend lila.
  EN TP: a dove on yellow flowers
  de TP: eine Taube auf gelben Blumen
  EN FP: yellow flowers in a vase
  de FP: gelbe Blumen in einer Vase
2114 | across (preposition): from one side to the other side | loc: über
  EN TS: A bridge across the stream.
  de TS: Eine Brücke über den Bach.
  EN FS: A bridge across the road.
  de FS: Eine Brücke über die Straße.
  EN TP: a bridge across a stream
  de TP: eine Brücke über einen Bach
  EN FP: a house across the street
  de FP: ein Haus auf der anderen Straßenseite
2115 | yoga (noun): calm stretching poses with slow breathing | loc: das Yoga
  EN TS: A calm yoga pose.
  de TS: Eine ruhige Yoga-Pose.
  EN FS: A calm dance pose.
  de FS: Eine ruhige Tanzpose.
  EN TP: a cross-legged yoga pose
  de TP: eine Yoga-Pose im Schneidersitz
  EN FP: yoga on a paddleboard
  de FP: Yoga auf dem Paddleboard
2116 | seaweed (noun): green plants that grow in the sea | loc: Seetang
  EN TS: Seaweed is floating around her.
  de TS: Seetang schwebt um sie herum.
  EN FS: Plastic is floating around her.
  de FS: Plastik schwebt um sie herum.
  EN TP: seaweed around her head
  de TP: Seetang um ihren Kopf
  EN FP: seaweed on a sushi roll
  de FP: Seetang an einer Sushirolle
2117 | pocket watch (noun): a round watch carried on a chain | loc: Taschenuhr
  EN TS: No phone, just a pocket watch.
  de TS: Kein Handy, nur eine Taschenuhr.
  EN FS: No phone, just a wrist watch.
  de FS: Kein Handy, nur eine Armbanduhr.
  EN TP: a golden pocket watch
  de TP: eine goldene Taschenuhr
  EN FP: checking a pocket watch
  de FP: auf die Taschenuhr schauen
2118 | fancy (adjective): decorated, expensive-looking and not plain | loc: vornehm
  EN TS: Such fancy golden shops!
  de TS: So vornehme goldene Läden!
  EN FS: Such fancy silver shops!
  de FS: So vornehme silberne Läden!
  EN TP: fancy golden shopfronts
  de TP: vornehme goldene Ladenfronten
  EN FP: a fancy dress party
  de FP: eine Kostümparty
2119 | pattern (noun): a repeated design of shapes and colors | loc: Muster
  EN TS: The owl has red patterns.
  de TS: Die Eule hat rote Muster.
  EN FS: The owl has green patterns.
  de FS: Die Eule hat grüne Muster.
  EN TP: feather patterns
  de TP: Federmuster
  EN FP: patterns on a dress
  de FP: Muster auf einem Kleid
2120 | perch (verb): to sit on a branch or a ledge, like a bird | loc: auf einem Ast sitzen
  EN TS: A bird is perched on a twig.
  de TS: Ein Vogel sitzt auf einem Ast.
  EN FS: A bird is perched on a wire.
  de FS: Ein Vogel sitzt auf einem Draht.
  EN TP: perched on a blossom branch
  de TP: auf einem blühenden Ast sitzen
  EN FP: perched on a window sill
  de FP: auf einem Fensterbrett sitzen
2121 | heavy (adjective): of great physical weight | loc: schwer
  EN TS: Heavy rocks, perfect balance.
  de TS: Schwere Steine, perfekte Balance.
  EN FS: Heavy bricks, perfect balance.
  de FS: Schwere Ziegel, perfekte Balance.
  EN TP: a tower of heavy rocks
  de TP: ein Turm aus schweren Steinen
  EN FP: a heavy bag of rocks
  de FP: ein schwerer Sack Steine
2123 | factory (noun): a building where machines make things | loc: Fabrik
  EN TS: This factory touches the sky.
  de TS: Diese Fabrik berührt den Himmel.
  EN FS: This factory touches the sea.
  de FS: Diese Fabrik berührt das Meer.
  EN TP: a giant steampunk factory
  de TP: eine riesige Steampunk-Fabrik
  EN FP: a tiny steampunk factory
  de FP: eine winzige Steampunk-Fabrik
2124 | road (noun): an open public way for travel by vehicles | loc: Straße
  EN TS: She is walking on a wet road.
  de TS: Sie läuft über eine nasse Straße.
  EN FS: She is walking on a wet beach.
  de FS: Sie läuft über einen nassen Strand.
  EN TP: walking down a country road
  de TP: eine Landstraße entlanggehen
  EN FP: driving down a country road
  de FP: eine Landstraße entlangfahren
2126 | spill (verb): to let liquid fall out of a container | loc: verschütten
  EN TS: The kitten spilled the coffee!
  de TS: Das Kätzchen hat den Kaffee verschüttet!
  EN FS: The kitten spilled the milk!
  de FS: Das Kätzchen hat die Milch verschüttet!
  EN TP: spilled coffee on the table
  de TP: verschütteter Kaffee auf dem Tisch
  EN FP: spilling paint on the floor
  de FP: Farbe auf den Boden verschütten
2127 | table (noun): furniture with a flat top and legs | loc: Tisch
  EN TS: There is a book on the table.
  de TS: Auf dem Tisch liegt ein Buch.
  EN FS: There is a cat on the table.
  de FS: Auf dem Tisch sitzt eine Katze.
  EN TP: a carved wooden table
  de TP: ein geschnitzter Holztisch
  EN FP: a table by the fire
  de FP: ein Tisch am Feuer
2128 | shoot (verb): to hit something with a missile from a weapon | loc: schießen
  EN TS: He is shooting from a chariot!
  de TS: Er schießt von einem Streitwagen aus!
  EN FS: He is shooting from a boat!
  de FS: Er schießt von einem Boot aus!
  EN TP: shooting an arrow
  de TP: einen Pfeil schießen
  EN FP: shooting a photo
  de FP: ein Foto schießen
2132 | abandoned (adjective): left empty and no longer used | loc: verlassen
  EN TS: The library is abandoned.
  de TS: Die Bibliothek ist verlassen.
  EN FS: The school is abandoned.
  de FS: Die Schule ist verlassen.
  EN TP: an abandoned library
  de TP: eine verlassene Bibliothek
  EN FP: an abandoned car
  de FP: ein verlassenes Auto
2133 | pillar (noun): a tall upright post of stone | loc: Säule
  EN TS: Stone pillars in the snow.
  de TS: Steinsäulen im Schnee.
  EN FS: Stone pillars in the sand.
  de FS: Steinsäulen im Sand.
  EN TP: pillars of stacked stones
  de TP: Säulen aus gestapelten Steinen
  EN FP: a pillar of a temple
  de FP: die Säule eines Tempels
2134 | empress (noun): a woman who rules an empire | loc: Kaiserin
  EN TS: The empress is not amused.
  de TS: Die Kaiserin ist nicht amüsiert.
  EN FS: The empress is very amused.
  de FS: Die Kaiserin ist sehr amüsiert.
  EN TP: a stern empress
  de TP: eine strenge Kaiserin
  EN FP: an empress on a horse
  de FP: eine Kaiserin zu Pferd
2135 | swirl (noun): a curling, spiral shape | loc: Wirbel
  EN TS: This cat is made of swirls.
  de TS: Diese Katze besteht aus Wirbeln.
  EN FS: This cat is made of squares.
  de FS: Diese Katze besteht aus Quadraten.
  EN TP: golden swirls
  de TP: goldene Wirbel
  EN FP: swirls of smoke
  de FP: Rauchwirbel
2136 | glove (noun): a covering for your hand with fingers | loc: Handschuh
  EN TS: The red gloves look great.
  de TS: Die roten Handschuhe sehen toll aus.
  EN FS: The blue gloves look great.
  de FS: Die blauen Handschuhe sehen toll aus.
  EN TP: red space gloves
  de TP: rote Weltraumhandschuhe
  EN FP: red boxing gloves
  de FP: rote Boxhandschuhe
2137 | halo (noun): a ring of light around a holy figure's head | loc: Heiligenschein
  EN TS: Golden halo? Very stylish.
  de TS: Goldener Heiligenschein? Sehr stylish.
  EN FS: Silver halo? Very stylish.
  de FS: Silberner Heiligenschein? Sehr stylish.
  EN TP: a golden halo crown
  de TP: ein goldener Heiligenschein
  EN FP: a halo of dark smoke
  de FP: ein Heiligenschein aus dunklem Rauch
2139 | laser (noun): a narrow beam of strong light from a machine | loc: Laser
  EN TS: Laser beams glow behind her.
  de TS: Hinter ihr leuchten Laserstrahlen.
  EN FS: Candles glow behind her.
  de FS: Hinter ihr leuchten Kerzen.
  EN TP: neon laser beams
  de TP: Neon-Laserstrahlen
  EN FP: a laser pointer for cats
  de FP: ein Laserpointer für Katzen
2140 | machine (noun): a thing with moving metal parts built to work | loc: Maschine
  EN TS: This place is one big machine.
  de TS: Dieser Ort ist eine einzige große Maschine.
  EN FS: This place is one big garden.
  de FS: Dieser Ort ist ein einziger großer Garten.
  EN TP: a huge rusty machine
  de TP: eine riesige rostige Maschine
  EN FP: a huge washing machine
  de FP: eine riesige Waschmaschine
2141 | basement (noun): a room below ground level in a building | loc: Keller
  EN TS: Something is glowing in the basement.
  de TS: Im Keller leuchtet irgendwas.
  EN FS: Something is burning in the basement.
  de FS: Im Keller brennt irgendwas.
  EN TP: an open basement door
  de TP: eine offene Kellertür
  EN FP: a basement full of boxes
  de FP: ein Keller voller Kisten
2143 | boulder (noun): a very large rounded rock | loc: Felsblock
  EN TS: Boulders stacked like Lego.
  de TS: Felsblöcke gestapelt wie Lego.
  EN FS: Bricks stacked like Lego.
  de FS: Ziegel gestapelt wie Lego.
  EN TP: a tower of boulders
  de TP: ein Turm aus Felsblöcken
  EN FP: a boulder rolling downhill
  de FP: ein Felsblock rollt bergab
2144 | t-shirt (noun): a simple top with short sleeves and no collar | loc: T-Shirt
  EN TS: She has a white t-shirt on.
  de TS: Sie trägt ein weißes T-Shirt.
  EN FS: She has a black t-shirt on.
  de FS: Sie trägt ein schwarzes T-Shirt.
  EN TP: a white t-shirt and jacket
  de TP: weißes T-Shirt und Jacke
  EN FP: a t-shirt on a hanger
  de FP: ein T-Shirt auf dem Bügel
2146 | france (noun): the European country whose capital is Paris | loc: Frankreich
  EN TS: France has a purple tower.
  de TS: Frankreich hat einen lila Turm.
  EN FS: France has a green tower.
  de FS: Frankreich hat einen grünen Turm.
  EN TP: a tower in France
  de TP: ein Turm in Frankreich
  EN FP: a bridge in France
  de FP: eine Brücke in Frankreich
2149 | ridge (noun): the long top edge of a mountain or hill | loc: Bergkamm
  EN TS: Ridge after ridge, all grey.
  de TS: Bergkamm um Bergkamm, alles grau.
  EN FS: Ridge after ridge, all green.
  de FS: Bergkamm um Bergkamm, alles grün.
  EN TP: rows of mountain ridges
  de TP: Reihen von Bergkämmen
  EN FP: a ridge covered in snow
  de FP: ein verschneiter Bergkamm
2150 | ponytail (noun): hair tied back so it hangs like a tail | loc: Pferdeschwanz
  EN TS: Ponytail up. She will go out there.
  de TS: Pferdeschwanz gebunden. Sie geht da raus.
  EN FS: Hair down. She will go out there.
  de FS: Haare offen. Sie geht da raus.
  EN TP: a ponytail at the window
  de TP: ein Pferdeschwanz am Fenster
  EN FP: a ponytail on a horse
  de FP: ein Pferdeschwanz an einem Pferd
2151 | crescent (noun): the curved sliver shape of a moon | loc: Mondsichel
  EN TS: The crescent moon is chilling.
  de TS: Die Mondsichel chillt.
  EN FS: The full moon is chilling.
  de FS: Der Vollmond chillt.
  EN TP: a crescent moon in clouds
  de TP: eine Mondsichel in Wolken
  EN FP: a crescent moon at noon
  de FP: eine Mondsichel am Mittag
2152 | lipstick (noun): colour you paint on your lips | loc: Lippenstift
  EN TS: Her lipstick is bright red.
  de TS: Ihr Lippenstift ist knallrot.
  EN FS: Her lipstick is bright pink.
  de FS: Ihr Lippenstift ist knallpink.
  EN TP: bright red lipstick
  de TP: knallroter Lippenstift
  EN FP: bright pink lipstick
  de FP: knallpinker Lippenstift
2153 | china (noun): a very big country in East Asia | loc: China
  EN TS: China has a flying dragon!
  de TS: China hat einen fliegenden Drachen!
  EN FS: China has a sleeping dragon!
  de FS: China hat einen schlafenden Drachen!
  EN TP: a dragon from China
  de TP: ein Drache aus China
  EN FP: a tiger from China
  de FP: ein Tiger aus China
2154 | general (noun): a top military commander who leads an army | loc: General
  EN TS: The general's beard is white.
  de TS: Der Bart des Generals ist weiß.
  EN FS: The general's beard is black.
  de FS: Der Bart des Generals ist schwarz.
  EN TP: an old general in armour
  de TP: ein alter General in Rüstung
  EN FP: a young general in armour
  de FP: ein junger General in Rüstung
